Dmesg output can also be very useful.
You can tell it's deep b/c of the typewriter font.
Hmm. The stay would have to be accordingly cheap in order to balance the flight, but it's unlikely....   Anything specific you can show me? Website/pics etc...
Nope don't worry about it, you should've smacked the shit out of them though. A lot of people see racism when it isn't there but that's about as racist as it gets.
&gt;it's a runaway victory for the little Hyundai.  Not so fast...you need to account for the fact that if you give people a car **they will drive more**. Gas demand will skyrocket, what do you think gas prices will look like? 
With the exclusion of: WantMyBananaRights, ignore the rest of the tards here. Seriously learn to grind, learn to turn your fingers into vibrators and learn to keep whatever part of your body you can grinding on her clit.  I've heard this and similar lines from hundreds of women and they all haven't been fucked properly. There are very very few women who can't get off from clitoral stimulation.   Sometimes it takes a lot of work but getting them off makes your orgasm or lack of orgasm that much better.   Also, every time you think you are doing it correctly, pay attention to them. Their faces and bodies will let you know if you are.  I've posted this way too many times here.
Fully upgraded turrets can be a HUGE pain in the ass to deal with. The only efficient way to take them down is usually to tactical strike them or have some guy spend a long time sniping w/ a spinfuser. One thing I've found is that orbital strikes placed directly on top of a turret often don't do a bit of damage to said turret.   Upgrading the radar sensor can be a huge boost to defense. In most pubs people don't mark targets, so it can be quite helpful to know which route the FC is taking while he's still about 10 seconds out from the stand. 
She's black hispanic.
I wish I could redo my first ride, it was so awesome! Congratulations and welcome to the club.
This isn't a reaction. 
Bodycount.  Horrible controls, horrendous gunplay, the entire thing is just flat out bland.
Hmm you're right. They are dickcunts.
how is that a problem? mine said 30 before i changed it
Dude, I'm a rower too and every time I go the gym I cry when someone is using the Erg.
I like all the mastiffs like English, Bull, Cane Corsos, and Great Danes to name a few.  I like large loyal dogs.  I find them appealing due to their size mostly seeing how I myself am a large person.  Also they are great guard dogs.
Gary Busey
"I like the idea that you can put your crap underneath it".   Now that's a post secondary vocabulary.
i've seen some shitty movie about the FBI taking down a religious cult like Waco sorta deal with Dean Caine in it that actually uses scenes from Terminator 2 cut in to it..
[Hahahahahahahahahahahahahaha!](http://i.imgur.com/fsCSL.jpg)
what a great book
I distinctly recall a movie on comedy central similar to this; but instead of smoking it, they used it to fertilize the plant.  Turns out smoking it made the characters see their friend's ghost.
How is this a thing?
I'm so late to this, but hate chocolate and mint together and I hate chocolate and raisins together.
Thank you good sir. One day I will cease being poor and Irish.
If it's within the statute of limitations, technically, yes, but I seriously doubt anybody would bother for drinking.  I wouldn't recommend that Dexter start posting his old kills in the newspaper, but a little underage drinking really isn't that big of a deal.
[Timecube](http://www.timecube.com/)
you should probably reverse tattoo that on your chest. 
They should make another board for Keith Richards, Lemmy, Charlie Sheen, Lindsay Lohan, Courtney Love, Steven Tyler and the shitload of other people that are/were big abusers of drugs and alcohol and still alive.
This is appropriate in college when most people are actually able to articulate something in a more professional manner.  The teacher however, was completely wrong in how he handled the situation, and does need to be reported.
I never stated what I said was fact, but that I believed I saw statistics contrary to what he said. 
If you want to learn to write java www.codecademy.com
I think black women can be some of the most beautiful women. Those people are just terrible. I have a roommate that "has nothing against black people but interracial shit just ain't right" (can you tell I live in the south??)  He's such an ignorant redneck.   I'll say what my high school history teacher said 10 years ago, which is, "There is only one race: the human race. Never forget that."
I don't see any of them laying down, crying, and holding on for dear life.
I recently learned that by holding tubes containing warm and cold water at the same time, you can trick your hand into thinking the water is hot. Have not tried it myself though. Is there evidence of this?
It took me a while to get through Les Miserables, but I definitely recommend it. It's a great read. 
Boil'em smash'em stick'em in a stew. 
It's actually not as stupid a question as it may appear. In low doses alcohol is a [stimulant](http://www.ephidrina.org/alcohol/effects.html) only in higher doses does it have the depressant effects that make you sleepy which we are all familiar with. Although I agree that its stupid to think that a small amount of a substance could effect your ability to fall asleep one way or the other.
Nice!
i once met this awesome lab and husky mix that was very well behaved, fairly calm, and extremely friendly when approached.  but it isnt as cool as my black lab because it isnt mine.
Dont forget to stop by Philadelphia, birthplace of the country!
obvz hax, rprtd.
I love XSeed, if only for bringing 2 of the 5 Wild ARMs game to PAL when I assume no other publisher would have done so. This seems like yet another great move by them, I'd love to see a few more JRPG's on Steam.  Keep it up, guys!
Because war on cars
Swede here, it has more of a gruel-y texture than a juice-y texture.
DIS AIN'T OVA [Bronson, Missouri](http://youtu.be/ZOJ1vmjffyc)
FYI: all women are fucking crazy, this is not WTF. That said, I love my crazy girlfriend. So fucking crazy... I don't even....
Alternate name for Troll Face in his early days: http://i.imgur.com/opYEY.jpg
What kind of asshole makes a Hitler quote their facebook status...?  Hope he never wants to run for office.
I think it's $200 for a 'meh' amp.  Unless the form factor appeals to you, I'd get a used integrated somewhere.  They're 1/2 the new price and work just as well, and then you're not stuck trying to get a preamp as well.  I never buy new, with the exception of my i-20, because they sell used for 90% of the new price.  You get so much better value for money getting quality used equipment.
Not Ron Paul. Get it right
Wow time to either stop working on my research project for the day or stop watching such weird porn perche I totally assumed you payed FOR the spikes...
My vote is on German Shepherds but it depends on your lifestyle.  Labs are great but can be very hyper and restless when they are young. Great dogs, shed like crazy!  Huskies are gorgeous dogs, one of my favorite, but they need constant exercise and mental stimulation. Without that they can get very destructive and hard to handle.  German Shepherds, from experience, are very smart and loyal. Some of the best dogs I worked with were part shep!
Happy Birthday my birthday brethren!
It's day 2 and I'm streaming again!  Please join and don't hesitate to ask questions or chat!
Story fix - GT, Pretend it never happened
A 5 year old might be willing to substitute all of his food for Reese's chocolate. And a 9 year old might be willing to drop out of primary school because learning how to write is "unnecessary".   Informed consent is the proper term here, and children aren't capable of giving it.
Given how quick the world is to call out "That's racist!" anytime you comment regarding someone's skin color or race, it was actually a very carefully worded reply.  As cautious as I was to avoid hurting feelings, but still share my opinion, I still managed to have someone throw shit my way. Thank you, internet.
Actually, you'd be surprised how many drains contain this matted snake of congealed sin, I avoid shower faps like the plague.
Nice B&amp;Ws!
Fake site. They're awesome, though. 
Yes, they do. And yes, it is.
oh XBL: Examinating the
I agreed that your arguments were valid and said I appreciated your points.  The fact that you draw the conclusion that I'm a "judgmental idiot" based on that makes me question your open-mindedness, not my own.  I never claimed to "know" "proper" English.  You know nothing of my fields of study, either. I'm always open to learning, but I see I'm better off doing it on my own than sharing discourse with someone who resorts to name-calling in a civilized discussion. 
Contract jobs tend to pay more to compensate for the fact that it's not stable employment.  This is the precise opposite of a government tenure situation.
Question: Does the tweed come with leather elbow patches?
Yes.
MULLATO BUTTS
FIDDLE IS ALIVE AGAIN!!!!! 
Most importantly, you should consider not getting into situations in which you feel scared to reject a guy's advances. I don't mean "you should never get intimate with a guy," but, rather, don't get intimate or even hang around people who wouldn't respect you enough to take rejection, should it come to that. You may be thinking "well, no shit" or something like that, but that's really the most important step. I certainly don't know your behavior patterns well enough to help you identify what you can change, but if, say, going to drug-addled parties with a bunch of strangers is one of them, then maybe don't do that. Or, if you're going on blind dates and ending up so intoxicated or under the influence that your judgment is impaired and you, say have to go to some guy's house you barely know, then please don't put yourself in that situation. If you're in a safe situation with someone whom you trust, then saying "no" is a lot easier. Also, you have to learn that you have every right to reject.  Also, don't listen to anyone who says to "just move on," "get over it," or  anything along those lines. everyone has their struggles. this is yours. i have my own, everyone does.   Oh, and I'm not of the "I'm broken" term - something i hear often. First, that works under the assumption that there's some flawless ideal that is attainable. Again, everyone has their own problems. Yes, some are more impairing than others. Some people may seem more adjusted than you, just as others will seem less adjusted than you. We've all got things to deal with and it doesn't help to make upwards comparisons, as that just invites self ridicule. What you need to concentrate on is how you can help yourself.   Sounds like you really need to think through things. As a mentioned before, a counselor helps. Granted, not all counselors are made equal. Some are better than others. Also, personality matters when it comes to counselors and clients. If you don't like your counselor's personality, then it won't be effective. I say this because sometimes people swear off therapy after their initial try is less than satisfactory. However, let's not get caught up on the counseling thing. Do i think it could help? Certainly, it can. But there's other options, if you'd like to reach out for help. Many organizations exist that help people with a similar history as yours. Take Back the Night (http://www.takebackthenight.org/) is one such organization. Granted, I know very little about them, but I remember they had a big event by where I go to college a few years back. Surely, other similar organizations exist and, unless you're out in the middle of nowhere, chances are that one or many others exist by you. May be worth checking out.  Sexual abuse and substance abuse can create a vicious cycle. One often influences the other, which, in turn, influences the other. It's a difficult cycle to break, and becomes harder to do so the longer you're stuck in the cycle.  If you feel more comfortable reaching out on the internet before doing so in person, perhaps visit http://www.aftersilence.org/ (I can't speak to the veracity of all the information on that site, but it could be helpful).
"Legit" or "retarded". I've completely cut out the use of "legitimately" in order to stray away from that slang word as much as possible. And when people excessively use retarded referring to some petty little happening in their day...well, that just grinds my gears, I tell you.
Cheese + anything.  I know, I may be the only person in the universe who doesn't *like* cheese (people who don't eat it for dietary reasons don't count, here). This is especially true for melted cheese, which gets ridiculously greasy.
Why are you disappointed then?  We are fighting for our freedom but sometimes it's so fucked up out there, we can't help but mock what's happening before our eyes.  I think this sub reddit is one of the most intellectual and most people who mock religion for no reason are shunned and downvoted.
Not really. Lions hunt mostly ungulates/gazelles that are smaller, and occasionally equivalent, in size/weight. Compare that to wolves, who can regularly bring down bison/moose/large deer that are significantly larger then themselves. 
It actually didn't happen.
Monster Rancher 3 was pretty good!
Bigfoot bait! How else are you going to lure Bigfoot?
Interesting that you admit it. Cause if the powers of the government are derived from the consent of the governed, that means when the consent is withdrawn, the powers of the government become illegitimate.   Cause I hope you do realize that the governed consent to being governed just because the people doing the governing writes so on a piece of paper. ;)
Very cool but wrong subreddit.
I thought it was 5 unrestricted line and 1 (one) restricted line.  Also, the "TIER" of your major adds a small multiplier to your overall score (this is to even out engineering/tech majors and poli sci guys a little bit).  Other than that, greesyMNKY is spot on.
i was thinking, in the manga after itachi speech madara suddenly show on the next page? can that be sasuke+itachi vs madara? meaing sasuke+itachi + kage vs Madara and the mummy dude? 
As far as in-game goes, you're best off with Archeops. I didn't personally use it, but Archeops did really well for my friends.  Personally, I like Woobat. It's cute in a weird way, and it's not too often that you get a special attacking flying type. The only advantage is that you're gonna want Fly, which is a physical attack.  Also, Sigilyph is a pretty good option.
and the majority of people do disagree with me, ala the down votes. 
Not for online retailers though, and I think that's where Mr Harvey sees a threat. Despite online spending still only being at &lt;5% of total retail.
That made me more confused..
After Twombly (which, granted, was decided on pleading more than the actual antitrust claims), it's hard to say that the antitrust system isn't fucked up.  The alleged parallel conduct was pretty suspicious and the Supreme Court decision interpreted some of the facts with some pretty clear bias in favor of Bell Atlantic.
congrats! found r/Mommit/ and r/parenting. 
I never realized those two words are cognates, but now that you mention it, it seems quite logical.
Yes, actually, I do. Because of men, which apparently you are of that number, think that if they are nice to a woman, they are getting in their pants. When I buy a drink for some one, male or female, I do it to be nice, but if some one, especially a guy, buys a drink for me, I have a hard time accepting it, because he probably thinks he's getting something out of me.   And just so that I'm one hundred percent clear, I'm not sleeping with you.  Because apparently, I need to put that out there right away in all of my social interactions lest I be considered a cock teasing, opportunistic harpy.
Thank you so  much for the advice. I never thought stretching would be so important but im  so going to give it a go as it seems so simple. And lucky me i can cook just not very well when you live in halls with only a microwave and a student budget :-P. But once again. Thank you 
This little guy is in first grade. He starts second grade on Friday. It all came up with a lesson in fairy tales. When I asked them for other examples of fairy tales, one of the brighter students yelped, "Jesus!" I was a little surprised at first, but after assessing everyone in the class didn't believe in any sort of deity, we all had a good laugh about it. When I asked why they thought it was a fairy tale, most of the students said the Bible was, 바보 (meaning silly or crazy). Needless to say, telling them some of the crazy fairy tales from the Bible was a hoot. They especially liked Zombie Jesus.  
That makes sense! On YouTube vids I see them finish with liquid liner because it's easier to fill in the awkward space next to the lashes.
How have I lived without it?!  I must find this in the US and report back.
Dat ass is Hypnotizing.
An apology at least would be nice, I mean come on it was at her mother's funeral.
&gt;It's published by Bethesda; they're not developing it.  Good, my anticipation for the game died down when I read the title.
He did, about two thousand years ago.  /snarky comment
dude, go for the autumn pick. awesome in everyway dude. cheers
If people are taking drugs to kill the fetus, the ultrasound requirement isn't going to change that. 
Now I'm just going to be disappointed next week. 
Schedule:  * Be a bane to Alex * Work on Schedule
Hmm, glanced at it, then I saw zodiac based statistics, uh oh!
The settlers hated Indians way more then the government did. Hostile indians tended to kill more settlers then polititions.
[](/soawesome)Ska and ponies. We need more of this.
anXiety.984
About a year ago I bought a lot of beef to create some jerky, and boy, do I love jerking my meat.
Gladiatorial battles.  
Somebody wrote "StuB" on a paper towel dispenser. I don't see what you're confused about.
Wasn't Hitler actually atheist? Thought I read somewhere that he actually just pretended to be Christian to garner support.
 I mean I'm suddenly more conscious of how, the whole past 5 years or so I've been drunk almost constantly. I wasn't even aware of all of the many aspects of my life that I was neglecting. I was being negligent.  and I was starting to become really really obnoxious socially.  I am certainly not dissing the CA lifestyle, I still *love* alcohol and am very grateful of it's existence... But am also looking forward to getting my life back together a bit, so that I can start enjoying my life, and then also enjoy drinking. Afterward.  but I'm hoping I can get it to where it's in the evenings mostly, and all day long only on the weekends, like a normal person.  Ever take a few days off and then all the sudden feel like everything is at normal speed again? And the days become much much longer because you are filling them with more activities?  And even you start moving your body around more, cleaning, doing errands. doing a a lot more of whatever it is that you do?  Generally having more thoughts in your head?  Obsessing about all of the times in the recent past you've been maybe a bit too insensitive to like, absolutely everything? I'm not saying it's even a negative thing to experience. Whether drunk or sober, going out and herping and derping through the day, you are going to learn a whole lot. Because *humongous changes in perception* that's why. It's just a trip is all.  
You have one to what?
webster's also believes "web 2.0" is a word when it is very obviously a *phrase*. webster's is not always right.
Since there are comments about how this is funny, can anyone explain the humor? Is it just lame unoriginal "LOL PEOPLE WHO GET RAPED DESERVE IT" or am I missing some kind of awful pun?   also lol at the downvote brigade ITT
Exactly! 
i made that mistake too..never again..well..maybe once more tonight. lol
Seconded. I've filled out close to 80 applications and haven't heard back from one. Apply everywhere and hope for the best. :/
So weird to see photos of where I work appear on Reddit.
At one point I had a friend the exact same height and weight as me, with similar builds. She was a size 2 and I was a 6. She was a dancer and one solid muscle.
To be fair, if you ever had an accident, you would know that Allstate is definitely up there in the screw-you department.  TO BE FAIR.
We knew about the possibility of spent fuel trouble last year - as was later discovered, it didn't happen or even come close to happening.  Using the fearmongering term "demonic" in the title makes the article appear to be sensationalism  unbefitting publication in a credible newspaper.  In any event, it really doesn't matter how greens, anti-nuclear activists (with religious overtones - c.f. "demonic"), and conspiracy theorists feel about nuclear power.  After the present crisis dies down, Japan won't be moving away from nuclear energy simply because they don't have credible alternatives except for LNG imports, which, as they are discovering, are very expensive, and coal, which is becoming expensive with Chinese competition on the world coal market. They don't have enough rivers for large scale hydro, geothermal is very diffuse, solar only does peak load (unless you want to get into $.60-$.70 LCOE per KWh oversized solar thermal plants with oversized storage - like the so-called "solar baseload" plant that has a 60-70% C.F. in Spain - that can help with intermediate load) and wind is only useful for specific loading regimes and not for general use as on-demand power.  Neither will the US as nuclear plants are the cheapest thermal generators out there even with the present prices of natural gas and there isn't enough hydropower to go around.  Continued media silence about the tragedy of the tsunami which caused 20,000 fatalities - while continued rapt attention paid to the Fukushima accident which caused 0 prompt fatalities and only a handful of injuries (but a number of evacuations and SCARY INDUSTRIAL PORN) - trivializes loss of life and demonstrates a deep lack of respect for the real victims of Japan's great earthquake and tsunami.
[He will pay for it!](http://i.imgur.com/nFBTN.jpg)
The site is pretty badly made navigationally.  Hover over the menu on the left to see a sub-menu.  From there there is a Get It page, which just links to the Unity 3D Asset Store.   It's $150. It seems like a lot, but I think this path deform is only part of a larger package you get, but the site is unclear.
I'm considering visiting the USA in June.  Things like this though, have me a bit worried.  Where I live we are pretty much used to asking cops for things about the law when in doubt, which as a foreigner might be something that is likely to happen.
That's a good trick... I'll have to try that next gun I buy... Unfortunately that means it will have to be a long gun...  I've always wanted a 22LR lever...
You're putting far too much effort into avoiding him and that's what's causing you to think about him. You're obsessing about avoiding him and that includes thinking about him. Wake the fuck up.
Neither do I, I'll pray to my impotent gods that this will be the end of it!
Damn it! That was going to be so convenient.
Sounds like you need to enroll in Google radio flashing school. 
The reason guy C gets more money is because he sells the tickets for more money. I'm not saying that's the way it should be, just theorising why.
Is that first picture...Brewer...hitting someone...?  I want to believe that's a 42 and not just a 4.  Also I do miss having Boyes on the team.
Oh my god I just saw this, how is my gender relavent to my advice in any way? This is actually troublesome. 
Where I'm from they always speed at literally 15 kph over the limit... 
I absolutely detest that poem, and think Whitman ought to be ashamed of himself. :P Richard Feynman's sister offered a succinct rebuttal in a documentary:  &gt;There's a poem by Longfellow [she meant Whitman] about watching the learn’d astronomer measuring the stars or something, and he goes out and gazes silently up at the sky. Well, when he gazes silently up at the sky, he sees these little points of light in this blackness. When a scientist gazes silently up at the sky, he sees these enormous suns, and galaxies, and magnetic fields, and the turbulence and the heat and the cold and the molecules in between them, in space, and endless distances, and great mysteries. And you have a feeling if you’re a scientist that you see a lot more.  I could not agree with her more. Facts and figures can be daunting at first sight, but what they reveal is so much more beautiful than anything the human mind can intuit. And why do people think scientists get into science in the first place? It's not because they just like playing around with numbers; it's because they see layers and magnitudes of beauty so much more microscopic and macroscopic than most people ever bother to think about. :)
I do not like potatoes (including french fries.) the ONLY form I like is tatertots. with ketchup. And cheese. And ground beef. (mixed together)
you shouldn't be sucking on it hard enough or with a tight enough "seal" to be able to tell if the screen is clogged. it would be *very* difficult to clog the screen to cause this. the whole top level would have to be clogged as well as the trench, and i don't see how that could be happenibg.   describe your technique and set-up.
Dad?  is that you?
You can see it on the "top of the boob" when she moves them up. Clearly implants
Holy shit. I had a really extended argument with this guy on the LSU campus while I was visiting my friends. He's absolutely insane, and he doesn't really argue, he just spouts unverified claims at a very high volume and flings spittle everywhere.
This is such a great response!  I hope you look at your SO's hard throbbing cock and literally say out loud "hell yeah, I did that."  Because if it were me, I would appreciate it greatly.  
Wow, I guess I have no idea what I'm doing. 
If fetus transplants were possible, I'd say that there'd be a lot less ground for me to stand on. ;P  Actually... that's a pretty cool idea. I envision databases of women that are unable to conceive who sign up to be the recipient of a donor embryo. It'd be kind of like IVF, except the donor embryo would come from someone who'd rather not have a child. It might be a problem if there aren't enough women available to accept transplanted fetuses, so I'd still want to see an option open if that's the case.
In theory it would just apply the update to the folder that you have launched LoL from. You may have to copy the dll into the new folder if the game does not launch however.
I'd really like the 50% off amnesia
[](/rderp)[That JPEG was kinda bad, so here I fixed it for you and also original source.](http://fc08.deviantart.net/fs71/f/2012/036/0/1/french_vinyl_scratch_by_cool77778-d4otdc2.png)  I like the picture, but not the quality, so this 1000x1539 PNG is preferred. :)  Edit: [This account](http://cool77778.deviantart.com) 
No worries, and as for the Urborg, yes I might be interested. What do you value it at?
I'm not even going to tell you what I think because I'll just get angry at how stupid people are...
Its more hardware dependent, i have a g510 and it recognize up to 8 keys pressed simultaneously. 
Traditionally they've been a rental company that takes a really hard line with wear and tear on an apartment, and they tend to screw people out of their deposit.  Apts Downtown used to be known as AUR, and I think they've changed their name a few times because of how poor they treat their tenants. One local attorney started a class action law suit against Apts Downtown, see http://www.dailyiowan.com/2011/07/27/Metro/24333.html and http://www.ictenantsclassaction.com/clark.html.  
CompEs struggling with CS159 is a little bit scary. The first weeks (months?) are literally printf/scanf. How do you mess that up?
Been to Alaska recently? Clearly a case of brain freeze.
gah! forgot about Radiohead until too late. But I'm excited to see some non-east coast phish shows
This quote still gives me goosebumps.
I was about to follow up with a "never leave". I had a boss that was basically the exact opposite of your boss at one point... I dreaded going to work.   In another life though, I got one that is on par with yours and though I love the work I do enough to make me want to go to work everyday. Having a good manager makes a HUGE difference and makes me want to be there that much more, its about respect feelsgoodman.jpg
Already did when another throwaway asked. If you're gonna try to embarrass me, at least use your real screen name.
If there was one thing I could eliminate in the world it would be raw tomatoes.  If they come on my meal (and havent contaminated the meal by touching anything to the point where it needs to be sent back) when I asked for the meal without them, they will be thrown on the floor.
Montana... No question. 
Austin wouldn't have been the darkside, the title would've read "I'm out bitches!"
Chained weapons are illegal in Canada.  Practice chucks are foam with a hollow plastic core and are legal as demonstration tools.  Obviously don't use them as a weapon because a) they are useless and b) you can be charged with assault with a deadly weapon.
Sign me the fuck up. I'm so there. 
A guy who I'd known for a few weeks asks me out for Valentines day.  He picks me up (staying in the car and honking) in my neighbor's driveway, parked with the passenger's side next to a snowbank and doesn't move as I walk through the fresh snow/ice in ballet flats.  He then takes me to Olive Garden. Except there is no Olive Garden in our town.  There used to be, it's now a gas station.  No worries, he says.  There's an Arby's down the street.  So I suggest we go to a movie instead.  Easy, no need for reservations.  We watch The Descendants (he asks me to pay since I suggested it.  I do, whatever, it's better than Arby's).  Now, during the night he was trying to impress me with how smart he is.  He's a biochem guy, and the rest of his family are in the military (he clearly feels superior).  It's fairly obvious, however, that while he knows a lot about his particular field of science, he's a bigoted (both sexist and racist) idiot.  But back to the movie.  I use what he called a "big word."  He then tells me that he knows impressive words too.  "Do you know what enigma means?" He asks.  Naturally I say I do and he tells me he just learned it recently.  A commercial comes on and I make a quip about it being enigmatic. He asks me what that means, so being the smart ass I am I reply with: "it's a mystery."  He furrows his brow and says "if you don't know what a word means, don't use it."  After the movie he goes to the McDonald's drive through since the large popcorn bag apparently wasn't satiating.  After offering to buy me french fries, he drives me home.  This time he parks on the opposite side of the street (again, passengers side right against the snowbank) and tells me he's not going to walk me to my door since it's icy.  That's fine by me, except as I'm unbuckling my seatbelt he leans in to kiss me.  Fuck no.  I turn so he gets my cheek then say goodnight and get the fuck out of there.  20 minutes later I get a text asking me if I'm a lesbian.  I know you're not a redditor but if you're reading this Josh, this is what you did wrong.  **TL/DR: Inconsiderate ass-hat acts like an inconsiderate ass-hat**
&gt;Even though he has no money, has to travel out of NZ  He has money.  He's receiving $30,000 a month.  A plane ticket from NZ to Germany costs what, 1-2k?  &gt;Germany has an extradition treaty with the US.  Having an extradition treaty *does not* require a country to extradite first off. Second, Germany's extradition procedures **require them to try their own citizens in Germany rather than extraditing outside of the EU**. &gt;(2) No German may be extradited to a foreign country. The law may provide otherwise for extraditions to a member state of the European Union or to an international court, provided that the rule of law is observed.  http://www.gesetze-im-internet.de/englisch_gg/englisch_gg.html#GGengl_000P16  &gt;NZ govt is so dumb they think a country with extradition treaties is not going to extradite.   I suggest you read up on [this](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dunning%E2%80%93Kruger_effect).  Than please learn how extradition actually works.  &gt;BTW what NZ laws did the guy break?  Why don't you do your own research?  If you did you would find out that [copyright infringement](http://www.legislation.govt.nz/act/public/1994/0143/latest/DLM346602.html?search=ts_act_copyright_resel&amp;p=1#DLM346602) which alone qualifies for extradition.
You're not going to get something that looks like that from random generation.
You're right, I bet you have a hard time counting to one.
C'mon dude. I get not liking fat people who both complain *and* do nothing, but she's going to the gym. I'm sorry she can't work out more to your liking.
[](/pinkamina) Oh wouldn't she now? How well do you know her? What does she owe to you to be faithful? Are you positive in your reasonings? 
I see your point as well. My feeling is that this man didn't go to prison for life because he falsified his driver's license data. He went to prison for life because he was a three-time loser. He knew what would happen to him when he committed that third crime -- I'm sure the judge made it very clear after the second conviction -- yet he did it anyway. Would he be dangerous if left on the streets? Who knows? I can't predict his actions, you can't, nobody can. What we know is that he is an habitual criminal who will almost certainly commit more crimes. Anything can happen during a crime -- there is always the potential for a homicide. I agree with you that some of the people who get this sentence applied to them deserve it more than others, and maybe this guy is on the low end ... but maybe not. We  have no way of knowing. At least we know that now he won't be free to commit more crimes. 
I've seen these Burt's Beeswax on this subreddit a couple of times and I never seem to find where the free part is, I don't use facebook. I only made one for things like freebies and liking UFC so I can see free prelim fights, mind explaining actually where you click to get the free Burt's Beeswax product? Would be appreciated.
Sickening.
A double fixed post? Single is bad enough.  Why not just drop this well used and very sweet gif in the comments of the original? You're better than this, Nolan.  Keep on trucking.
i see a future meme.
General injury was just discussed in [Training tuesdays](http://www.reddit.com/r/weightroom/comments/q9nil/training_tuesdays/) yesterday in r/weightroom.  here are two writeups on back injuries, the first is mine, the second is from JasonPKaplan  Lower Back About a month ago, I was going for 5 reps of 305 on deadlift for the first time. I barely had any sleep or food, and consequently tried to grind a rep out when i shouldn't have. I felt a strain in my lower back. I talked to a doctor, and with my specific case (very localized, minor pain, only pain during flexion) he just said give it some rest. I waited two weeks, did no rehab for it, and consequently strained it again. This led me to these series of articles by t-nation:  The first two are on single leg training in general, the third is on lower back friendly training, and the last two are specifically on the rear elevated split squat.  http://www.t-nation.com/readArticle.do?id=4832886  http://www.t-nation.com/free_online_article/most_recent/my_top_5_singleleg_exercises  http://www.t-nation.com/free_online_article/most_recent/backfriendly_leg_training  http://www.t-nation.com/free_online_article/sports_body_training_performance/build_bigger_legs_one_at_a_time  http://www.t-nation.com/free_online_article/most_recent/bulgarian_split_squats  I've been doing 5/3/1 for bench and press while i work on maintaining lower body strength with no deadlifts or squats, and the single leg work has been a life saver. I've only been incorporating it for a few weeks, but the advantage is being able to keep your torso fairly upright takes most or the torque off your lower back. For whatever reason, i've been able to continue to do GHR/back extensions with light weight without feeling pain in my lower back, and those have helped ensure i wont strain my lower back the second i start deadlifts again For anyone else in this position, i would really recommend these exercises to keep yourself ready. Letting your lower back atrophy while you rest is a sure way to injure yourself again.  That being said, each case is obviously very personal. We're talking about your back, it's worth asking a doctor (i happened to know one personally). Understand the line between grinding out a rep properly and putting yourself in a stupid position, which paul carter talks about in his IAMA.  Lastly: I can't speak to the medical accuracy of this article from t-nation (perhaps someone else can): but here is an aricle about the phases of recovery. It warns against jumping back into heavy weights the second you feel better, as your body still needs some time to properly repair any injuries.  **From Jason:**  For the back: I found this here so you've probably seen it, but treat lordosis with hip flexor stretches. Some of the other advice is already being done for shoulders, so that's good; add in some everyday hip stretches and you should be on your way to a healthier lower back.  I'd also advise fire hydrants, scorpions, kick backs, and clam stretches. Usually I just do fire hydrant circles with a leg extension/kick back incorporated, or alternate between them. However, I love scorpions for releasing tension in the lower back (I get a good crack, which I like). I lift from the hip as well as bending at the knee, and do a big arch, alternating with smaller motions like in the video.  Some vinyasa movements can be nice to wind down. Start in a yoga plank, move into an upward facing dog, pull back into downward facing dog, and repeat. It's worth it to take a few yoga classes and learn a bit, feeling out what works great for you (and what doesn't), incorporating that stuff into your stretching routine. But be critical, as some yoga movements might not be right for you; [utanasana](bigutanasana), for example, the forward fold pose, isn't recommended for those with potential spine problems. If you want to stretch your hamstrings, do a lying hamstring stretch.
* Sunshine * The Shawshank Redemption * Amelie
Yep! A common misconception about Gateway is that that isn't intentional.  They do that because it gives someone 9,00000 options for feel. But it DOES make getting two of the same a bitch. I like it, provided that you can pick out your putter in person. 
xoxo- Gossip Girl 
The minion-map is a mod that you should be able to find on google. You'd have to talk to the server administrator about it on multiplayer though. I think there Is a separate download  for the multiplayer one. 
Renekton would like to have a word with you...
This is a very unsurprising outcome considering sunflower seeds are much smaller than the gaps in a chain-link fence.
Suck a donkey ball, reposter.
Wow, this is fucking incredible... It strikes me at a loss of words, fluid and coherent thought... Seemingly, it just barely prevails over my reminding yet repressed, constantly urging, venting vice which drives me to maniacally rant in my own self-indulging enjoyments here... Simply for the sake of itself... Viciously, belligerently, but sweetly and sentimental - in an almost vibrantly fevered manner, delirious... Yet with cold, frighteningly lucid sentience; in petty and petite phrasing prose of this  pleasingly peculiar, particular piece... Ellipsis, ellipsis, ellipse; etc... Formulaic absurdity in the form of a self-portrait, a soliloquy.  I thank you, deservedly, for my introduction to the artist.
Isn't that like a violation of rights or something?
Do it on [Amazon](http://www.amazon.co.uk/UBI-Soft-TERA-PC-DVD/dp/B0074H96E8/ref=sr_1_2?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1330559117&amp;sr=8-2).  It's free-er.
Good choices!
I think the fact that most politicians get elected for set terms is part of the problem. They're only accountable when they're in election-mode, and after that, they do whatever they want without fear of being fired for gross incompetence. And since people have a short memory, they don't remember the dishonest things politicians did a year or two ago, and keep voting them in.  I think the very fact that Harper is taking the robocalls affair lightly is an indication that he shouldn't have any power over anything. He should be fired without pension, period. It would be easy to justify it, along with his general contempt for public opinion and democracy in general. We can't afford to have someone in charge of the future of 34 million people if we're not entirely convinced he cares about these people and has a strong integrity. If we really can't find anyone better than this jack-ass, then following electoral law is the least of our problems.
I've worked at McDonald's since high school, and I'm 24. It sucks, but trust me, it's better than unemployment.  Also, despite the fact that most of the crew is probably teenagers, you'll probably notice that there are people older than you on the crew, too. You're not the only one getting stuck with a fast food job.  I should note, though, that if they offer you a manager position, don't take it. It's a trap. You get a lot more responsiblity, and the pay raise is low enough to not be worth the responsibility, but just high enough that it would set you back a lot to start over at next-to-minimum-wage again. Unless you want to work at McDonald's forever, stay crew.
What in the flying fuck would possess you to repost this?
So, did they break up and he is no longer with her?  Broke up and got back together and he for some reason kept his status on single, would the girl not be offended?  Because if they have been together this whole time, why would he set it to that in the first place and still be with her and then change it? It is weird.
Halo  I bought it when I got into PC gaming because my parents were strict about the ESRB ratings at the time and I missed out when it was first released. Since it was considered a classic I put it on my list of games I had to retroactively play.   How did anyone ever enjoy this game? The levels were repetitive, the excessive use of color was just as bad as any of the "too much brown" going on now, the driving controls were garbage, and the characters were completely unlikable. Maybe it's just suppose to be fun for the multiplayer, but the single player campaign was painful...
haha nice. I'm currently in financial law but with way too much fiscality for my taste. I'm thinking of changing to something more international, it's all very blurry right now. What about you ?
I came here for this. Why does this word make people so uncomfortable?  After I eat at KFC, I clean my hands with a moist towelette.  After washing the dishes and squeezing most of the water out of the sponge, the sponge was moist.  I don't get it.
You must really hate gays if you are willing to have a system were every heterosexual couple is forced to register their union twice, once as a "marriage" and another as some kid-friendly term just to make sure that same sex couples cannot use the word marriage to describe their union. That is some top notch hate.
When I see gay people make cool cars and great potstickers, then I'll be all for their public affection. They must prove themselves like the asians have for centuries.   On a serious note. Maybe I am implicitly prejudiced on some level as you say. I was just responding to how that pic made me feel. I do not act upon it other than a quick comment on reddit. 
Now that I've actually watched the video, this guy was being horribly uncooperative.  For the first few minutes, they're all trying to explain to him that if he wants to file a complaint, he needs to be interviewed. That's their policy.  They don't have an anonymous complaint system in place. I thought, from my experience as a deputy in WA that this was normal, but someone actually just clued me in that some places do have an anonymous system in place. This just isn't one of them.  Around 1:30  &gt;"Do I have to give ID?"  &gt;"Well, you're gonna have to tell us who you are if you're gonna make a report."  1:37  &gt;"First, why don't you tell me what happened, then I'll tell you if somebody did something wrong to you."  &gt;"I feel like, you know, that somebody did something wrong, you know..."  &gt;"Sometimes people don't.  ABRUPT CUT  This whole video has been "tastefully edited" to make it appear as if everyone involved is being unreasonable. Their policy is to interview you, then if you choose to go ahead, you get a form to fill out. They want basic details first to see if you're just going to blow smoke up their asses.  How does he expect to file a complaint if he won't say what happened? What would the paper form say? "I've been wronged, but I won't tell you by who or when or what happened." Why even file a complaint than?  His escalating mistreatment was based entirely on the fact that he was acting like a crazy person. He would annoy the shit out of anyone.
With an AR though I can put some rounds in your area without the precision that is required for a bolt rifle.  Combine that slight advantage with a bit of latency and they die before they can get a shot off.
Has the gamertag "xx69ingmonkeypawnerscodnewb420xxx"
Crossing fingers for Santorum. 
I figured there was some irony there somewhere...
Is it just me or do all the kicks sound the same in this?
[ORLY?](http://alltheragefaces.com/img/faces/large/misc-you-dont-say-l.png)
It was quite clearly *not* a parody of Inspector Spacetime. It was trying to *be* Inspector Spacetime.  Besides, from the sort animatic I witnessed, I'm glad it was stopped.  "Where are we Inspe-WAIT NO I FORGOT NOT WHERE BUT WHEN TEE HEE REPEATING JOKES FROM A SHOW THAT DISPARAGES MEME BASED HUMOUR HO HO"  Seriously, the writing was awful. Inspector Spacetime should stay in Community itself unless it's actually written by the Community writers.
Which is the best Sonic game ever.
Don't get me started on chips...  ಠ_ಠ
Which was probably the worst thing to happen, considering the entire team was immediately dismantled *and* was picking from the back, every round. That was a team that needed help in the draft because it was a fluke to have made it.
Not to be confused with Microsoft Gray.
Her dietician is an idiot. Please buy [Dr. Bernstein's diabetes book and read it together](http://www.amazon.com/Dr-Bernsteins-Diabetes-Solution-Achieving/dp/0316182699).  It may change the trajectory of both your lives.
I concur.
Stab said organs repeatedly. Time warp and raise them better.    Or introduce religion.
Make one comment about having a small penis and [Reddit Enhancement Suite](http://redditenhancementsuite.com)[Reddit Enhancement Suite](http://redditenhancementsuite.com)[Reddit Enhancement Suite](http://redditenhancementsuite.com)[Reddit Enhancement Suite](http://redditenhancementsuite.com)[Reddit Enhancement Suite](http://redditenhancementsuite.com) never forgets it.
Yeah, I actually feel bad for the guy.
I do not think that the department should be sued.  I think that you should be allowed to sue the instigator of this raid, and all the members of the SWAT team who took part in this illegal raid.  Now your have personal accountability and not at tax payer expense. /in my dream world...
So the Confed Cup doesn't qualify as a competitive game? You're such a troll. The result may not be significant...but the performance absolutely was. No one is arguing this result actually means anything. But the performance the US put in means a tremendous amount toward the teams improvement.  And your bullshit condescending attitude about supporting the team where you actually live is completely senseless. Why does it matter where you live? You think just because they play in your back yard that makes you a better fan? Grow up dude. It's fans like you that shame this sport. 
Holy shit, i totally missed that you said Bingo at the beginning &gt;.&lt;
Winkey+I  Or Winkey+R, "shutdown /s /t 0" ("/r /t 0" to reboot, add "/f" if you want to force it)
&gt;You, however, are forbidden to touch them.  &gt;&gt;That's correct. It's called free speech. Call me crazy  Yes, you're crazy to claim that preferentially allowing certain speech and forbidding other speech is freedom.  PS It's quite amusing that you got butthurt about having your contradiction pointed out.
All a Christian needs to do is be bored and slightly uncomfortable to help out others.  God captures their mild discomfort and harnesses that energy to work miracles.  Didn't you know that?
Yup [THERE](http://i.imgur.com/l6CSY.png) she is...
Since the recommended is 24442mb, I would set the Initial size to 22000 and the maximum to 27000. This will give your system a little room in either direction.
Well, you know what they said, kill the buffalo - kill the Indian. 
You are right.  If the US does it or says it it is right. Wonder why so many countries don't like us.
Are the servers down so the admins can privately test/get the plugins working or is that done somewhere else?
I don't mean to shit all over bus transit. It's just that sprawling, crappy suburbs are not designed to be efficient in any way so buses are one more thing that don't quite work there. 
I would suggest it, but it's your call! 
When fighting Xertah ahri will be able to unload her full damage. She will ult to xer and W. W has a huuuuuuuuuuuuge amount of power and all three plus the three from the ulti will hit him. Since he will be rooted a double orb will hit him plus he will be charmed midway. Half of xerath's burst WILL miss whereas ahri will be able to land her FULL burst.
Cthulhu much?
I'm a girl. 
Whew.  Thanks.  That makes me feel much better. ;)
Could be the same blower. I have a marble on mine that looks exactly like the second one on the right on yours.
Probably customer service and IT people to take care of WOW's servers.
Even working from Debian, the best documentation for using and configuring most programs is from the Arch documentation.
Tightest butthole good sir.
The cheese, it does nothing!   (for the taste/texture/smell that is)
congratulations! gainful employment is scarce these days, and i hope you use this as a springboard to bigger and better things. as for your friend, fuck him. 
I've never done this, but is it possible to call CCC (Consumer Credit Counseling) to get help with this? That, and/or sign up with a credit union which may offer a program to do something like what you're looking for, or at least save you some money.   It looks like your #1 goal is to consolidate your CC debt. #2 is a solid emergency fund, so you can stop spiralling into the same situation every time something goes. I'd be interested to see what your budget looks like to see where you can divert some money every month to build up an emergency fund. I'd use something like Mint.com if I were you, or something automated, so you never see it and won't be tempted to spend it. 
Black women are beautiful. (some white dude)
Nah, not even worth it.  When she fucked the best friend (friend #2) it was a big deal. All my friends knew, I found out in a shitty roundabout way instead of either of them coming to me about it, shit hits the fan. I get super depressed, cut myself off from everyone for awhile, but eventually got over it and made my peace with both of them.  The other three guys she slept with were over the course of the months after I had made up with her. When I learned about each of those individual flings it was just kinda like "huh, yeah, thats really not that surprising." Still hurt, but it was more disappointing to realize how slutty this chick really was and how little my feelings for her mattered. We don't talk anymore.  As for the guys, I never bothered saying anything to any of them about it. Not worth it. If given enough alcohol, they would pretty much fuck any girl that would let them, so there's really no expectation that they would restrain themselves with this girl.  And for anyone thinking that I'm applying a double standard regarding sexual promiscuity; everyone in this story is equally slutty. Guys, girls. All whores.
droid 4 is on sale today only for leap day @ $99 online if you have an upgrade.
Hello can i get whitelisted im frenchfreak21 and can my friend NVGH. please, Thank you!!!
Thanks!  It took quite a while to complete!
[what](https://www.google.com/webhp?sourceid=chrome-instant&amp;ix=sea&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;ion=1#hl=en&amp;safe=active&amp;q=meme&amp;tbs=dfn:1&amp;tbo=u&amp;sa=X&amp;ei=7btOT67iDoaQiAe2xOzcDg&amp;ved=0CCoQkQ4&amp;bav=on.2,or.r_gc.r_pw.r_cp.r_qf.,cf.osb&amp;fp=eaddf0b359a0b449&amp;ix=sea&amp;ion=1&amp;biw=1599&amp;bih=789)?
Not old enough.
...Another "TIL something that's taught in elementary school".
That's awesome! Seems I def made the right choice. 
Guess I should have read every comment. I already made a post stating that cilantro tastes exactly like the bile my stomach produces. Just the smell of it makes me sick
I don't think race has anything to do with looks. Just a bunch of racist ass holes, don't think anything of it.
Well, I bought a few other items, so no shipping. Taxes, came out to another 10 bucks for me (I live in LA). Use the promo codes mentioned in this thread if you need free shipping.
This guy is the biggest pussy I've ever seen
Everytime I hear those laugh tracks, I can only think about how most of them [were recorded in the 1970s](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Laugh_track) and a lot of those people are long dead by now.
I don't think there's a built-in cap but I'm pretty sure 15 is the max recommended for bandwidth reasons. On a gigabit LAN I don't believe there's any technical reason within minecraft that you couldn't set it to allow for multiplayer with farview.
Guns don't kill people, the government does...
Awwww! Someone's going to need more hay in their diet!! Haha, just kidding. Congrats. Bonding is a huge accomplishment!
Being able to stay home on a rainy Sunday when everyone else has to go out...
i think it's relevant and undersaid. sure i have thoughts about it that come down to necessity vs. convenience but it's ultimately not my call. 
 I'm 13. Unsurprisingly, everybody on the internet hates me. 
Fuck yeah. I was going to berate her anyway if it was something shitty like "Breaking the Law" or "Turbo Lover". Leather Rebel is solid Judas Priest, though.
[Sorry](http://i0.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/original/000/202/263/618d619d-c7e7-416d-8019-29b78a8f54ea.jpg)
glad I'm not the only one who got the reference! xD
I meant is there a pistol similar to this one more so than the ammunition, but thanks!
How do you suggest we 'rank' teachers?  Perhaps a 'No Child Left Behind' system of standardized testing like in the states?  Since that's working so well down there...
 I'll answer your Nagel quote with one from Futurama "The Problem with Popplers"   Farnsworth: “Hey! Unless this is a nude love-in, get the hell off my property.” Hippie: “You can’t OWN property, man.” Farnsworth: “I can. But that’s because I’m not a penniless hippie.”
Yes, modify the AppIconShadow.png and turn it transparent. Then place it in UIImages folder of your theme.
A kiss to build a dream on!!!!
Ninja condors. If you're going to watch just one ninja movie make it this one.   Story of Ricky. I dont even
He kinda showed everyone in his class his wiener.
Age | User | Title | Reddit | Cmnt | Points :--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:-- 5 days | [WhenInDoubtGoWithCC](/user/WhenInDoubtGoWithCC) | [I'm sick, carry me!](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/q3n7q/im_sick_carry_me/) | [/r/pics](/r/pics) | 204 | 1663 4 days | [rimnonam](/user/rimnonam) | [Someones afraid of the vet.](http://www.reddit.com/r/aww/comments/q5dep/someones_afraid_of_the_vet/) | here | 36 | 502 3 days | [iFearDolphins](/user/iFearDolphins) | [They're after me!!!](http://www.reddit.com/r/aww/comments/q68qe/theyre_after_me/) | here | 5 | 2 * See 21 more matches at [KarmaDecay](http://karmadecay.com/r/aww/comments/qc11g/big_love_and_big_guns/)  *This is an automated response*   [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/help/faqs/SimilarImageBot) | [Send Feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Feedback Id qc11g&amp;message=[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/qc11g/\) 'I like feedback') | [Report Error](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Error Id qc11g&amp;message=[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/qc11g/\) 'Help me grow')
Don't sue the organization. Sue the individuals. Subpoena the organization to find out who did the kidnapping, and sue the fuck out of them. Subpoena the organization to find out who were the guards that did the beatings and allowed the beatings, and sue the fuck out of them. Basically, assume the organization is  legally blameless, and hold every individual accountable for their actions.  Win a few lawsuits, take a few bastards for every last dime, put out a few press releases about it, then start getting elected officials involved. A big stink will do more for shutting down places like that than a big settlement will.
You lying shit, I posted **once** earlier and deleted it after some downright bigotry in the comments. Hundredth this month? You gotta be fucking kidding me.
I'm not a fan of any of the people you mentioned, but I have to say I think you're wrong about Courtney being a nobody and talentless. She wrote some good tunes, and was actually selling a lot of records by the time she and Kurt hooked up.
Domino, biatch!
by "sexier version", do you mean that she's both real AND not your hand?  ...sorry, I couldn't help myself.
I can't stand Lily either.  Marshall could have done infinitely better than her.
I see what you did there.
ARE YOU A BAD ENOUGH DUDE TO HIT YOUR SELF IN THE DICK WITH A HAMMER.
Do you like Ferre Rochers? Nutella is just the chocolate in those
The good news is, soccer is more available to the USA than ever before, even compared to four years ago the difference is astounding. It's growing and picking up its pace, soccer is definitely a mainstream sport in America, not nearly as popular as football, but it's honestly not that far off basketball and baseball.
Yeah, just realized it's not exactly a low-spec game, despite the somewhat shitty graphics.  They really haven't optimized that game at all.  And Dwarf Fortress takes up crazy amounts of CPU power due to it's ridiculously realistic simulation of things like flowing water, the needs and desires of snailmen, and spears doing calculated amounts of damage to layers of armor, cloth, and dwarf flesh.  The rest of the games I listed should run on just about anything, though.  
Let me know what you choose and how it goes.
5th and Shinies, good EV's/IV's, or other legit event legendaries
A textbook
I read this as 'Internet Explorer' young children.   I think this is worse. 
20% off prices which are already marked up 300%.  edit: Sex and the City 2 blueray, 36 dollars?  really?
No problem, my un-lowly Canadian compadre.
Thanks a lot, that´s really nice of you!  As I said some comments above, I really apreciate but I don´t think it´s necessary. I will consider putting my books as digital sale in the future though, you helped me realize something so simple that it had never ocurred to me!
Brick and Mortar store for me there is this local retailer going to buy it there. 
So hot but wrong damn team
looks like battlefield 4 is coming along nicely
So, I know everyone is colored, but I don't really converse much about skin color - this differentiation comes from South African friends really. What vocabulary should I be using in your opinion?
Not familar with UK school but a Junior in High School would be equal to 11th grade and typically people are about 16 when they start that year and turn 17 over the course of the school year. Basically he has one year more of high school before he would go off to college.
Money is on Jarvis, the Avenger's butler.
If you push your nose as if it were a button, the sneeze will go away
I felt like I could let it slide, because it was a lost opportunity at love I would say.   But I agree, it wasn't nearly as important to Jon as Drogo became to Dany, or Tysha to Tyrion, particularly when he learned she wasn't a whore.
I don't know how to feel anymore. :(
I'll try to put my best idea of why not coming from someone who deals in an industry full of NDAs (Film industry).  NDAs really aren't just the money or the fact that you can be fired from your current job. In the either film or game industry they are more of a community than any other career field since its a much sought after job. This makes it so one, word gets around fast of who leaked what and why as well as people take it seriously when you hurt someone. With these two facts understood if you break a NDA and hurt the company you are working for pretty bad you are basically blacklisted from working in the career field you worked harder than hard and are luckier than lucky to be working in. With this said yes leaks happen and not everyone gets blacklisted but that has to do with the fact that some NDAs are a lot stricter of what you can say and when as well as most "leaks" you see are actually orchestrated nowadays for publicity. So in a company like Blizzard it is very understandable why someone wouldn't want to leak anything.
If you don't know the section geometry (ie: cross section shape:...box, i-beam, etc.)  then you cant get the section modulus.  Sounds like you need more info.
Very blurry, but cute.
I am here!
when I was volunteering in an orphanage in xela, guatemala this happened to me. I was putting together puzzles with some children and all of a sudden my skin pricks up like a crowd is about to come in. Lo and behold, in walks a massive group of Dallas, TX ministry youth with their creepy pastors and their cameras around their necks. They walked around the orphanage, made some comments on how cute the kids were, completely interrupted my activities with the kids, took some pictures holding up the "poor orphans", and bounced. Just like that. whoosh. 
&gt;What is this based on?   A *huge* number of studies.  And go play "ad hominem insinuations" somewhere else.
Nice! People who have seen her shows will get that. 
Butt slut
"He" started with a capital and ended with a period. The other "he" (both assumptions on your part) explicitly stated the count of the word 'buffalo', so assuming my assumption was both incorrect and beside the point. Pah!  &gt; im pedantic  Well done!
wut?
Thanks! I may just hold onto it then. 
No, not true story. SirSteven is doing what we call 'lying' by saying it happened to him.
Damn that is fantastic color, and a really cute style on you!
:( Jealous. I just ordered one from the website that was posted... and pre-ordered the issue #2 cover I want.
Awesome pictures! What'd you take these on?
Makin' me blush.
URGE TO KILL... *RISING*...
Wow!  Thank you for such a well worded and thought out reply.  You make an excellent point.  However, it will continue to annoy me when people younger than I am, and I'm still young, claim to be nostalgic about watching new episodes of F.R.I.E.N.D.S or some other such thing.  Perhaps it will annoy me a little less in the future!  (I didn't mean that in a snarky way at all, but for me intent is sometimes lost in text.)
hehe, once i've seen scarlet's ass on that picture
First level comment, so OP. But lol you can answer too if you want seems like you might.
I called one of these for Jedi Knight once. My mom was pissed because I managed to run the bill up a whole 30 dollars. 
I am actually finishing up a giant work project today. Things will in theory clear out at the end of the week.   The question will be if I get a breather or if I keep getting loaded with more. 
Great doc. Thanks for sharing. Here's my nugget of knowledge:  Plan for contingencies.   Campaign have your characters stowing aboard a goblin slaver ship and slipping into their hideout? Be ready for them to decide to just kill everyone aboard and steal the ship.
&gt; 367 karma  Best I can do is a little over 7/10ths of a cat. What part of the cat do you not want?
hahahahha min dubai/?? 7lween 2ana kint 3eyish bi dubai....7elo minnik ;))
As shitty as Wilco cops are I rarely see them on or near the courses, and certainly nothing as bad as what the OP described.  Even playing at midnight my friends and I have never been hassled, whether at OSP, Cat Hallow, or Wilco Park.  I thought I had just been lucky, but I have spoken to a lot of people I've met while playing in Wilco and most have similar stories.   In all of Austin the only course where cops regularly make me feel uneasy is Northtown.  
Anyone who can be pushed to murder (especially mass murder) because of a bad day was, ipso facto, not "perfectly sane" to begin with.
Actually, in school in Germany we learned that one tsp is 4ml and one tbsp 8ml. Maybe German spoons are smaller?
Not bad, that might actually work. A bit server intensive, but a good start nonetheless!
I am a Christian and I don't hate gay people. There are people in my life that I love who are gay. The hurt resonating from your post made me think of this letter to Louise: [God Made Me Gay : A Letter to Louise: A Biblical Affirmation of Homosexuality](http://www.godmademegay.com/)
I've received probably less than 5 'hate mails' ever since I got XBL, which was in 2004(ish).  However I've received ~100 messages from little kids saying: "MESSAGE TO ALL FRIENDS AND RECENT PLAYERS I AM HOSTING A SUCH-AND-SUCH LOBBY BLAH BLAH BLAH GIVE ME MICROSOFT POINTS"
Not only does this not belong here, but he's actually completely wrong in the data. RP's budget will drastically decrease government spending.  You don't call for the abolishment of most federal agencies and the withdrawal of all overseas forces whilst raising debt...That's absurd.  Krugman intentionally distorted the data by assuming that all RP's eventual plans, like abolishing the income tax, will happen overnight...I'm sure it will be gradual while we pay back our debt.   And a debt of ~40-70% GDP (completely ignoring net position) is a perfectly normal figure. Debt encourages peaceful international relations and cooperation. At a low-moderate level (like 70%), the interest rate isn't too bad yet either.  Krugman shows his colors again. Fuck that guy.
I'm a white girl. I had some of my best dates with black men (some actually being from Africa). Why were these guys so great and sexy? They tended to be very direct, confident, and open with me -- which was incredibly attractive. But if you took away their personality and made me look at them merely on looks? Well...they were still some very good looking dudes. ;) So there is absolutely nothing ugly about being 'black'. Don't you dare think that about yourself or anyone else!   I've dated people from pretty much every 'race', and have all continents covered except Australia. Yes, I had quite an enjoyable time in my early twenties. ;) Anyway, the guys all had this in common: they were fun to be around, intelligent and funny. . To generalize, across time and place I found sexiness to be from personality...and frankly would you want to be with someone who didn't put your personality first? Remember to value yourself, appreciate yourself, and screw anyone else who would put you down. 
Wow here is a thought. maybe the spikes are to prevent the homeless from sleeping on the benches. seems pretty ineffective, but maybe.
Do drinks count? If so, I hate any kind of soda
Why....why does blue not have an expansion?
I would personally use the Lee Sin page (AD right?) and start with E.  Although due to the fact that Fiora has both an AD steroid and an AS steroid she's very versatile with runes and masteries.  The AS steroid is up less so AS is probably preferred overall.  But I think the Lee Sin page is probably better than the Udyr page because movespeed quints aren't that important IMO, though that also differs on playstyle.  Test both and see. My guess is AD/ArPen over AS/MS, but with Fiora's versatility, pick whatever fits your playstyle.
In my opinion, the fire-roasted tastes like someone took a shit on a piece of bacon, ate it and shit it back out.  Verde is the best sauce, however.
so would Jax...
...Crap. I'm a derp.
well shoot.. better luck next time?
No way. The dude is 70 and looks 50. Either he's got a great plastic surgeon or good genes.
I guess when two trolls meet under the bridge they must bacon at midnight.
The law of cats is higher than the law of man.
unfortunately i do not however here is anawesome related wallpaper i hope you enjoy http://i.imgur.com/PCyUG.jpg
I just jailbroke my iPhone and found a ton of complete Zelda Themes that are pretty damn good.
I appreciate the humor in that.  A more valuable RES tag for me would be something along the lines of "knows entirely too much about firearms."
I would consider that totally smothering and would probably freak out.
please let it be a decent game and not a dumbed down crap 
Is that even legal? California is pretty strict about gift cards.
I don't even understand how someone could do this :'(  That dog has such sad eyes. Ugh. I hope the poor thing gets lots of love and care from now on. Milkbones and snausages everyday!
For a great selection of beer, check out Brasserie St-Bock on St-Denis street; 20 drafts, 250+ bottles. 
i have, for several different characters
The giving tree showed me where all the wild things are.
God damn! Feed that girl a cheeseburger or three!!!
Wheel problems can go from a slight issue to a total catastrophe pretty quickly.  If the spokes themselves are bent, then the wheel is under uneven tension, which is weak. Get it fixed and taken care of soon before riding it much if at all. 
Thanks you so much, that's awesome!
I hope they make it free for Gold, he really needs to make it up to the Gold member community.
Well quizes aren't really part of learning. It's to check how well you learned the material and a study incentive.  
Wow, did you really need to throw in a jab at Gabourey Sidibe there? I mean, you even went through the bother of spelling her name correctly (something I have trouble with despite being a fan) just to compare her to an ape. You are exactly as bad as the little jackasses being described in the story. There's nothing wrong with not finding her attractive, but bringing her up as a specific example of ugly is asshole behavior.
I cut some of the cherry tomatoes up, actually! I wanted to add fresh basil, but I didn't have any on hand.  I wish I had leftovers. So yummy.
Have you had luck with microsword with a non-CO2 setup? I finally gave up on it and replaced it with pygmy chain sword since I didn't see any root/runner growth for several months. 
[Found a better picture](https://fbcdn-sphotos-a.akamaihd.net/hphotos-ak-snc7/395545_2250991053278_1803324505_1403135_1266308972_n.jpg)
Either the Dancong or the Wuyi. The Laoshan Green is AWESOME but possibly not heavy enough for a wintery tea.
Fuck, at least the campus police at my old university decided to be more honest about it.  They got rid of the "protect and serve" and replaced with "enforcement through cooperation" on all the cars and uniforms.
[Oh hay what's goin on](http://i.imgur.com/b2F4Z.jpg)
Excellent! We may have a winner here! Great news about the aux in!
&gt;laws allow women to make false rape claims and get away with it.  Wrong.   &gt;[Instead after a gruelling three-day trial the teenager found herself in front of a judge being convicted of falsely claiming that she was raped last summer when she was just 15.](http://www.guardian.co.uk/society/2011/jan/28/false-rape-complaint-prosecution)  &gt;[A woman jailed for "falsely retracting" allegations that she had been raped six times by her husband will today lodge an appeal against her eight-month prison sentence.](http://www.guardian.co.uk/uk/2010/nov/08/rape-case-woman-appeal)  &gt;[In 2008, an 18-year-old woman in Washington State reported to police that she had been sexually assaulted. But they didn’t believe her. Lynnwood Police Chief Steve Jensen said that her story changed, her details were inconsistent and that people who knew the victim expressed doubts about her story. So the police charged her with false reporting, and she pleaded guilty under a deal that included a fine of $500.](http://msmagazine.com/blog/blog/2011/04/15/woman-pays-for-reporting-a-rape/)  In that last case, the reported rape turned out to have actually happened. Good thing they punished that woman for reporting it, though, right?  &gt;[A mother-of-three was today jailed for two years for falsely claiming she had been harassed and raped by an unknown stalker, despite protests from her family and anti-rape campaigners that she had been telling the truth.](http://www.guardian.co.uk/society/2010/mar/04/rape-claims-gail-sherwood)  &gt;[A young mother who falsely cried rape, sending an innocent man to prison for nearly four years, will experience firsthand what he suffered -- she'll spend one to three years behind bars for perjury.](http://www.nypost.com/p/news/local/bronx/justice_happened_things_system_solomon_JyyLFVitMM4bx63gpD1ouI)
I think black people are both attractive and ugly, just as white people are both attractive and ugly. It all depends on their facial features, it has nothing to do with race. I will tell you though, as a white female, I am very jealous of certain black girls hair. I wish I had that kind of curl!
I don't think it's too bad, you just have to play it safer, although there's definitely a difficulty jump. It's one of the hardest areas next to ToG, and very confusing for new players. The chairs and tables thing really pisses me off. Same with how the archer on top of the shelves can hit you sometimes when you are sitting at the bonfire. 
Fair point. Hadn't thought of that one. Congratulations, you win. Have an upvote :)
Whoa whoa whoa, at which point did you piss yourself in all this?
A common misconception.  Water/ice naturally does take on a blue color because it [absorbs the longer wavelengths (reds and yellows) of visible light more efficiently than the shorter wavelengths.](http://wiki.answers.com/Q/Why_is_the_ocean_blue)  Also, [it does not appear blue because it is reflecting the color of the sky.](http://www.scientificamerican.com/article.cfm?id=why-does-the-ocean-appear)
*it's cool to kōrero*
&gt; He's created several significant decks.   Yes, like Flores Red, Flores Blue, Florezhov, Flores' Angels....
I don't understand what (not the herp) meant.
I had the same thing happen to me during my MSC, it was great experience!
Ooooh... such a big troll. Try harder next time, bud.
The consistency is iffy...but the taste? mmmmmmmmm...sugar.
And even they thought this was stupid. 
My hedgehog was a brilliant angry little prick. She went to heaven. Most likely. :( 
No worries man, I wasn't trying to slate on your piece. I think it looks nice and I have no issue with anyone being creative in any way. I guess I just became jaded after seeing dozens of similar things being posted. Apologies.
You can't handle the proof!
I pay about 650mo for a very, very nice 1 Bedroom Victorian, about a block away from downtown.  But I've seen some shitty ones in Old Colorado City / S. Nevada that rent at about 800 to 1000
Is she calling you daddy? I just want to make sure I hear it right. Very hot.
Youve never spoken to a Muslim in real life have you?
Nerd most likely.  Ever since I started reading these books the names have been one of my favorite parts.  I would love to know how he came up with these great names.  Just having names like Mark Mullendore, Mathis Rowan, Left-Hand Lucas Codd, Lothor Brune, Harry Hardyng, and Cortnay Penrose in the back of my head helped with the quiz.  Couldn't have guessed the sigils but I remember many of the names.  
Your friend is a moron and leech on society. How dare she take my tax dollars so she can wait to find her Nice Job..   I hate really hate people like that. She needs a dose of reality.
Be careful of what you ask, the answer can be quite surprising.
Only in so much that if you don't like the answer you'll get, cleverly word the question to get the correct outcome. Say for example the govt want a yes vote in favour of internet censorship, asking:  &gt; Do you think the internet should be censored?  ...will get you a no.  &gt; Do you think that sites that contain or promote child pornography, scams and terrorism on should be shut down?  ...will get you a yes.   And then the govt can claim that they got an overwhelming yes vote in support of internet censorship. The same thing happened with the vote for the Common Market. Nobody in the country wanted to join Europe so the question was worded to ask if people were in favour of a free trade agreement.
it's not that big of a deal 
*cringes* at Portable 3.  :P  You're right about the translations. Just typos sometimes irks me even though I typo sometimes, but to see it in a game makes it even worse even though this has nothing to do with actual gameplay.  When I heard news about DJMax Technika I knew I'd have to get a Vita for it! And all the other games for it.  Oh man this is also the first post in the sub for a while.
I can get you both Spheal and Bagon. I will papark them over once the beat the E4 in Diamond. I can get you any other Hoeen Pokemon as well.
&gt;If the pictures and/or profile look interesting, I'll answer.  So... if my messages generally don't even garner a profile visit. It's my pic probably? I think my messages are pretty good.
Haven't heard "munter" for a while.  I'm sure you will find plenty of quality clunge on your travels. 
Omg I my fourth grade teacher's last name was kadar!!!☺
Thanks. I remember hearing about it when it happened, but I hadn't realized the case was on trial now.   Definitely something I'll be keeping an eye on!
nom nom nom on your HAM :3
Update released today fixed it. Must have been a know issue. Yay! It's been 37 degrees for the last few days lol
So then do backplates not effect this at all? It would certainly be nice to not have to buy one but I just want to be sure as I'd rather be safe than sorry and buy one if it does help a little.
i developed a system for lasting longer and its fairly easy to learn if you enlist her help. you know the kegal muscles? those are the ones that you use to stop peeing mid-flow.   1. when you are having sex just put your dick in and hold it there. this is where she comes in....she cant squeeze it, move around much or anything to stimulate you because what you are working towards is being hard and feeling everything while lasting as long as you want.  2. pump the kegal muscles without fucking her. you should be feeling your dick throb inside her. she will more than likely enjoy this. pump a few times and stop, pump the kegals for about 10-15 secs and start thrusting in and out until you feel over stimulated, stop and pump the kegals until you calm down.  3. when you are super hard and youve done this for 5-10 mins push down like you are trying to pee in her pussy. youll be hard enough where this should be impossible but i think the way it works is your dick kind of opens the hard on valves and drops the balls just a bit where you arent over stimulated and can fuck her a loooong time. when you want to cum simply pump the kegals a few times to pull the balls up (your body does this naturally when you cum) so allow you to fuck yourself over the edge.  4. if you do this enough (it took a while for me to develop this technique so i cant tell you how long it might take you to master from scratch) you can fall into the technique fairly easily when you know what you are doing. 
Name relevant.
I get this in my right hip when I do mountain climbers. My trainer says that it is fine and that it may go away when my muscles get strong enough to protect the joint a bit better.
¿Que?
He's your fucking father.  He helped give you life and everything else since then. Fuck your video game and help your dad. Games are a form of leisure for most, and even those who do it for a living can afford to set it down for family. 
I recently self-published some books, and in an attempt to get my name out there, I guest posted on a few blogs. One of them happened to be about [this very subject.](http://soupandnuts.wordpress.com/2012/02/11/get-smart/)
I just bought one off eBay for my wife's Macbook Pro. Authentic, new and unopened - still in Apple packaging. Ended up costing me about $50.   I'd check there but, as some others have said here, be sure you're getting the real thing. Look for one unopened and still in original packaging. Apple batteries are complicated things. There are lots and lots of cheap Chinese batteries floating around out there, many of which may not work correctly or may even damage your computer.
I have a dosette box (pill organizer) that has removable days (if im going to sleep over someplace i only need to take that day's pills). I always take my morning dose with breakfast, and always my evening dose with dinner, that way i never forget because i rarely forget to eat (and my Latuda needs to be taken with food, which helps).
I just couldn't imagine how uncomfotable it must be to have you glans rubbing up against your jeans all day every day.
Nah. Don't sit around and do nothing at least. If you do nothing, nothing will happen. Don't rush it, but start forcing baby-steps, even if you don't want to because you're scared.  Take it from someone who's been there, done nothing.
You have your render distance set to far and farview turned on?
~~I wish they did melt, but they survive.  They just don't leave a snail trail.~~  Disregard.  I suck at Minecraft.  They take damage now.
Oh?  Why don't you tell me what they are, so I can make sure I don't do them accidentally.
**DO THE MARIO**
**TWO SPOONS.  YOU HAVE BROUGHT ME TWO SPOONS EXECUTUS.  WHAT IS THE MEANING OF THIS BREACH IN DINING ETIQUETTE?!**
And each hour the passes only adds to the stress I'll be dealing with.
It's certainly not strictly enforced, not even close, but it is factored in along with gamer score, rep, etc. I do notice a difference when I play sports games in Pro mode vs say Recreation. The chances of getting my ass kicked in Pro are much higher! lol
Low. all day in kitchen terms means put in and check every 4 hours.
wait, there's a wave?
Did this ever happen? 
Ya, and sometimes my PhD professor doesn't follow correct coding standards while giving an example. The nerve of some people.
no you cock
Wait, sex with females?  Tell us more.
I heard someone say that New Yorkers are douchey and think that they are better than other folks in the US just because they live in NYC.   I think that New York is awesome, so I decided to root for the Knicks and pretend that I'm better than everyone else too.
Do like :3
Not sure if really friendly... Or just Canadian...
No.  It happens to everyone and is completely dependent on the mood of the officer and socio-economic privilege.   Cops wipe their ass with poor white people just as much as they do every other minority who happens to be poor.
"he may select items from infantry wargear" hmm good point cause only the networked marker light is in there :/ confusion! [edit for sounding sarcastic!]  The felechette's are used for when the railguns get shot off, which has now happened 4 times in a row on a practice list. This allows defence against anyone stupid enough to assault them (they are high value targets afterall) but also let it become quite a practical offensive weapon should t's main system become neutered. 
I would also kind of like it if r/atheism stopped trying to hijack other subreddits. I really don't want to unsub r/funny. 
These work a lot better if they are presented in their full context rather than quoting one line.   Quoting one liners if you follow the writings of anyone that is prolific enough you can end up painting whatever picture you want.   You don't have to provide links to me for these as I've read the articles these came from and then before jumping to conclusions went and did some research.  Why?   Because, the first time I saw those out of context quotes I had deep concerns.  So, instead of just biting at the bait and calling it the end of discussion I did some research of my own.   For the record: I am not a Christian   For the record: I am pro-choice   For the record: I am pro constitution   For the record:  The Theory of evolution is a theory.   At one point it was a hypothesis.   By scientific method any theory should be constantly challenged.   Each challenge will either make it stronger or will pull it down.   So, do I agree with Ron Paul on that line?   No.   Does  it really concern me that he thinks that way?  Nope.   Does it mean a thing to me that will change my views on evolution? No.   The first quote you listed.  That article is used a lot.   What he stated there is not true if you take that one line.   However, if you read his entire article you will see that he was referring to the RIGID SEPARATION OF CHURCH AND STATE with things like making people take down Christmas trees, or even stop calling them Christmas Trees and call them Holiday Trees.   He thought that was stupid and was not what the Founding Fathers envisioned.   He is correct.   I say this as a non-Christian.  In fact if you force me then I am an Atheist.   The founders were fine with Religion in public.   They were not fine with Religion in Governance.
Work makes free
The fact that I'm tagged as anything in someone's RES pretty much makes my day. 
How about a pic with more body?
MUSHROOMS. Honestly, wth.
Light rail can't make it over the mesa.  RTD would have to lease the existing heavy rail line.
Oh, Riften isn't *that* bad. It's part canal.
You guys do know the rest of the world also made movies in the seventies?  Zerkalo, Kozure Ôkami: Shinikazeni mukau ubaguruma,  Pentimento, herz aus glas, El Topo, Eraserhead, Voskhozhdeniye, Performance, Beloe solntse pustyni, Dersu Uzala.
[Of course not! It's the Cornucopia!](http://imgur.com/zEaqd)
yeah, i was just noticing that. i will give it a try. it is salt, it's cheap.
but why? whats the point?
I don't actually remember which song, but I was listening to the album Watershed.. I *think* I was on the song Bridge of Sighs from the special edition.
A new trailer might come out a few weeks before it comes out.
Ok car, AWESOME trailer.
That is an awesome name! I named my son michelangelo (probably not as rare as REX) and people always ask questions like why would you name him that and i'm like 'cuz it's awesome and a freaking ninja turtle!
I'm going to send out incredibly nice, good-natured messages after games in order to make the front page but get none of the karma for it. I just want to find another redditor who loves me.
Well, that depends on whether you'd view countless hours of looking at car crash victims and other such tragedies and accidents to get the gory character design of the necromorphs *just right* as awesome.
You should have said, " I will date anyone but a white guy. I prefer a penis I can see without having to pull out my microscope." 
How much would those things be worth to you? I'd rather a PDF or two, and not have to pay 5 bucks more per purchase.
To be fair, any girl who does that is craving attention and isn't worth it.
Get a new friend
I was being sarcastic. I think a dry suit is a given.  Never tried 7mm but when it drops to 14 centigrade (57 Fahrenheit) in a 5mm wetsuit i can no longer enjoy the dive.
But the Julian calendar isn't responsible for it, nor is it even the first calendar to have it (see the egyptians).
[PROOF]
Or just completely naive people who have no idea what's really going on or how to internet or the resources that right in front of them (e.g. College Freshman, people who *actually* buy books from the college book store).
I found hobo eggs in a hobo nest once. Millions of them.
See /r/PoliticalModeration
So... do just happen to be Indian...?
Man, this is on page 2 of reddit. It hasn't event disappeared from the top and your resposting it. At least wait a while...
cut paper with scissors. fuck scissors.
its a reference to Euker (spelling?) a card game where the lowest trump card is a 9 of hearts
Comics involving this face are the main reason I occasionally browse /trees.
Please answer the question, sir.
Excellent reminder. So I won't leave then!
i have read some horrifying stories on reddit about these kinds of cysts.
[Relevant reaction](http://youtu.be/u3X5f3gY4iw?t=1m)
Indeed. We have three taps: Hot, cold, tea. 
evry tim
There are several different things that can make kidney stones. . . 4 main types I forget all four but the type I get are calcium-oxalate   These are specifically made worse for me if I drink dyed sodas. . .   So Anything clear is fine sprite, dew, 7up etc. However Pepsi or Pibb. will own me hard.  Specifically if you have this type it is manageable just don't eat the crap that causes it.  So I either have to cut out calcium or things with oxalates in them. . . Needless to say you gota keep calcium :D
That makes him even worse I think. When he has a gf he tells you to leave him alone, when he loses her he needs you around for entertainment. That's all bad.
I use it irregardless of whether i'm around people who say irregardless when they are around people who hate the word irregardless.
It wasn't about smart.
I've had a go at one in a friends house, he plays about 6hrs of MW3 a day.  It felt great, I didn't notice any lag, it didn't feel quite as sharp as the PC (I suppose that is lag) but it's a lot better than a PS3 pad, a lot.
Same here. :D
The yoga ethics that I referenced were not written by Judith Lasater, but rather a committee of various yoga teachers interested in upholding certain ethical standards which are laid out in this document.  Judith Lasater's name comes up as I believe she headed the movement for this, and is fairly well known in the yoga community. Yoga teachers are not legally bound by this document, but are asked to observe it for their sake and their students. Perhaps my message wasn't as clear as it ought have been, so I'd like to clarify something: yoga teachers are not trained as psychologists, and are not meant to assist in working out the emotions that may arise in a yoga sessions.  There are trained, specialized people for this.  If one understands the body/mind connection well, some people experience emotional releases when doing certain postures, and it may just be really confusing for people at first.  A yoga teacher can explain this body/mind connection to students, which is something that rarely happens with a personal trainer.
Too many times to count.  Can't you just see them laughing at us...."they fell for it, AGAIN!"  To be fair, Obama is not alone in being stupid here, Bush and Clinton both committed similar stupidity.
I'm alright. But yeah, it's really annoying when some of my family comes to watch. I have to avoid draugurs and dragons and such
THE FALCON!   Then we can get some pizza from the Chole Hole. 
like. the character itself makes me laugh, I love how he says. this is a carry, a properly played fiora will domiante opponents with almost no chance to escape. pretty sure he says that every spotlight. omg lol stop making every hero a carry. where the support or tanks?
[Soundcloud](http://www.soundcloud.com)
&gt; without some shred positive feedback I may not have continued at all.  Doubt it. You either have the comedy mental illness or you don't. Besides, who's giving you feedback at that stage besides well meaning friends, obligated family &amp; other delusional open mic idiots?   
jesus christ kinda sucks
Phone calls are not allowed, only to parents or approved people and they are usually monitored at these types of places. If the kid tells their parent they are being abused, the worker hangs up the phone, calls the parents, and says, "Little Johnny is trying to manipulate you. Remember why you sent him here?"
Haha yea he's got ridiculous amounts of models. Every time I give him a batch back, he gives me another 40 or 50 models to paint. 
Work in Fast Food.  What looks clean, isn't always clean. Oh, and, don't let your kid lick the table. That was just water in the bucket. 
You reach out and touch the picture then run out the door to their house? D=
A stranger is in a cage in front of you.  You can press a button to free him, or you can leave and let him starve.  If you leave and let the man starve, have you done anything wrong?
This will probably get buried since I am late to the party BUT:  Your friends attitude is the EXACT problem we have in this country today. I would love for our country to start emulating Swiss and other countries like them with their universal healthcare and awesome social safety nets but those systems only work because on the whole people don't abuse them. Not having a job is embarrassing there and people are motivated to find work because that is their culture despite the fact that they have awesome resources for the unemployed. If the same system were to roll out in the US it would be completely flooded with frauds and shysters looking to get a free ride with no intent on actually putting in a days work.
Your friend is not right at all. An honest wage is an honest wage and in my opinion, you do what you have to. She should be happy for you that you're getting your life in order (not to say that it was out of order before).
Chartreuse makes you not care! n_n
Politics in the USA is a farce of a reality show. What don't you people understand? 
&gt; A couple times I've messaged guys because I noticed they keep looking at my profile...I figure they're just shy so I'll say something like "hey I notice we're both checking each other out so I thought I'd say hello!" I get messages back when I say that :)  How do you notice the "multiple looks" at a profile? Or does it just list last visit? I've thought about this, but I felt it would come off as creepy rather than mutual interest (unless it's multiple times - rather than the "look once, then she looks" deal)
I saw that, but I'd be more interested in a fact check (fact clarification, really) of it than looking at it again.  Specifically on the issue of the impact of a wood stove or fireplace in a typical first world household used at typical frequencies and under typical conditions.  If I remember correctly, he took the "it's harmful to some extent at any level, and so should be completely avoided" approach, which I don't in general find to be a useful way of looking at risk.  I'm much more interested in the comparative risk of fireplaces and other things I encounter in everyday life.
join the FB group. All events are posted there.
Shinies, good EV's/IV's, or other legit legendaries
Then here's the [official cite](http://encyclopediadramatica.ch/Rules_of_the_internet) you ass wrangling douche mongrel  YOU DO NOT TALK ABOUT THAT PARTICULAR BOARD. EVER. EVER EVER EVER EVER EVER EVER. YOU ARE THE CANCER
One more thing - Any corrections must be given only if you catch them in the act. Grab him by the collar or scruff with a firm NO or NAH AH and take them outside to finish. Treats and praise and party party party when he goes outside. Make sure you are cleaning the spot with an enzyme cleaner that actually breaks down the molecules causing the odor. 
I'm really curious as to what just happened at the end O_o;
2 x 1GB DDR DIMMs will cost around $60 according to Newegg. If you are feeling adventurous or want to learn about disassembling laptops you can upgrade the CPU either to Turion ML-40 or ML-37 to get a little speed boost. Used one will cost around $30.  Upgrading the HDD to 7200 RPM IDE will set you back more than $100 unless you find one from Ebay. There are IDE SSD drives available but I have no experience with them. I do have experience with CF-IDE setups for old laptops and they work very nicely with Puppy Linux or similar distros.  EDIT: If you upgrade the memory and do a clean install of Windows 7 the machine will be a lot faster.
Here's the list of items in case I log out in my (also sexy!) prot set and you can't see them:  * Mechanized Snow Goggles * Heaving Plates of Protection * Sage's Cloak * Icebane Chestguard * World Keeper's Gauntlets * Icebane Girdle * Templar's Legplates * Rock Furrow Boots * Citadel Enforcer's Claymore   The pants gain ugly brown patches where the legs currently are showing if worn on a male, unfortuantely. :(
"Never pass up an opportunity for a shit or a shower."  
disappointing to not have a pattern, but unerstandable. I make stuff up all the time :P Also, they are really lovely. Maybe a future project could be writing up the pattern for the rest of us.
Great stuff man!
would hurt your eyes sooooooo much
How do you manage to be employed at the local Starbucks of every reddit reader simultaneously?
My sister! Excellent choice, if I may say so; fuck cognitive dissonance.  Edit: I was raised Catholic and was miserable. Became some sort of deist and felt like it was special pleading. Finally said, "Fuck it all, I'm not defining my life by other people's ideas," and only now have the opportunity to be happy without meaningless intellectual baggage.
we all have different desires.
I planned it for a few weeks.  With the work schedule my she kept, getting her out of town was tough, so I planned it around her birthday so as not to arouse any suspicion. Took her to one of our favorite coastal towns.  We went and bought sandwiches and salads, some wine and champagne.  I had a basket and a blanket in the car that I bought specifically for the evening.  We put together a picnic dinner and walked down to the beach shortly before sunset. It was always her dream to be proposed to at sunset on the beach.  So after we ate and had a glass of wine or two, as the sun made the sky glow orange and the water shine, I got down on one knee, told her I loved her and couldn't imagine a future without her, then asked her to marry me.
they could still work as pocket square
some google searches ended me up at this [page](http://sdrcgsls.blog.163.com/blog/static/139135658201201183312601/)
A consultant?
when it comes to history the bajorin's are space jew, but when it comes to racial stereotypes feringi are space jews
Yep, I've played a bit of the older RPG's, and I've been wanting to start over too.
I think a good starting trio would be Spheal, Arron, and Trapinch. They even retain the weakness/resistance's once they become dual type.
I think I'm having a similar problem- being relatively new to linux, could you elaborate on reformatting? Did you just reinstall Ubuntu or is there a command or something like that?
I posted it before to someone else who commented. Here is what I wrote:  &gt;The reasoning behind it is because it's easier to package, contain, transport, and uses less materials. Also cheaper to make that way. Also quite handy since it comes with 3 1.5 litre bags.
I bet. The one I have is a little more stable compared to the S107. But I bet the more expensive ones are way better; the one I have won't even compare.
hopefully there's some standard to who plays, don't want them to do even more trash talking after what happened in that tribes beta game lmao
Of course.  Die Hard and Terminator are fun as well as also being good  You're confused between what makes a movie "good" and "fun."  People are saying this movie looks like a grip of fun, and arguing that it won't be because the writing won't be on par with Terminator 2 is absurd at best.  Who the hell watches action movies for the writing?  Obviously, weirdos like you.
try flashing a different radio.  Was it the recommended radio for the rom?
this deserves it's own post.  you gotta get dat link karma, bro
Bitter melon?  Can't say I've even heard of that . . . 
I love me some Locke Lamora. Book 3 needs to be released.
But how will alts work when the transfers are live?  If unlock the legacy stuff on Dalborra, do my transferred alts use their old legacy xp/name or do I get the new one?  Do I need to not make a new legacy name on the new servers to keep my existing main's name/legacy xp?
This is...gross. On so many levels.
In terms of combinations, lemon on fish. Really dislike, but love seafood without it.
I like the - fill the hole with trash then use that to prop up a piece of paper, then paint the paper roughly the same color as the wall method. 
New photos
Yep. I bought FlashMetroid's dual-modded vlx stick.
Thanks to this post, I put kiwi in my oatz.
Wow, I just had some crazy ZZT flashbacks.
Nice! Which album?
yes there is http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/IPod_Touch#Models  4 g as in 4th generation
My point wasn't meant to address your situation directly.  The post I replied to mentioned that a person has to be rich to get an attorney or someone to fight for you.  It's not the case, there are options out there.  Not every attorney doing *pro bono* work is out to make a name for themselves.
But Main Street's still all cracked and broken!
What if we just said thanks? I don't mean a modest thanks, I mean a bold faced 'you're goddamn right my legs are nice!' kind of thanks. The guy is confused, you feel empowered, and he knows that his words had zero negative effect on you. I figure, by now, a 'how dare you' kind of reaction is what they expect, and I wouldn't wanna give them an inch of satisfaction. 
The Womens Building in the Mission. 
FLAMING GLOBES OF SIGMOND!
Growing up in Trinidad, I didn't have pretzel sticks. We used Popeye candy sticks instead. http://beta.images.theglobeandmail.com/archive/01333/web_popeye_small_1333160a.jpg
who would seize .su?
The first part is probably aimed at redirecting output of program. "&gt;" and "2&gt;" redirects output and error output to given files. [This](http://tldp.org/LDP/abs/html/io-redirection.html) might be useful.  As for the second part maybe [this](http://www.tuxfiles.org/linuxhelp/wildcards.html).
She's trying to relate to you, let you know she's cool so you can confide in her
Can you post a link to the concert info? If there are still tickets available I would love to try going.
[](/party"Woah looks like a party over here!") [Better grab my party cannon!](http://i.imgur.com/iLK2Hh.jpg)  [Wait, there's this one too...](http://i.imgur.com/uRAQhh.jpg)  [Dear Princess Celestia, WAT DO?](http://i.imgur.com/KI6jL.jpg)
Just toked, now I'm sitting here trying to make the same face as the Hal in the image.
My birthday is this weekend. It'll be a neat mix of people food and absinthe.  Memphis is good. There's a whole lot there.I the rock and soul museum and great food. So much awesome bbq. Get to NY for sure. If you're doing the east coast, don't forget Miami.  I believe the strawberry festival in florida is about this time of year too.  Are you doing any west coast at all?m
well I tried it
Potato Salad Potato Skins Twice Baked Potatoes
Slower, but stronger than one handed. Has a chance to cause staggering.
Thanks for the research!  We also thought about the adhesive, but they use the same stuff near the wrist to hold down the tube and I never get the rash there.  The agency is just as stumped as I am, unfortunately, and they just attribute it to dry skin.  The problem is that I don't have a problem with dry skin anywhere/anytime else.
I read quickly the Mozilla article.   Let's try and take it step by step:  1. User wants to watch a movie in HTML5 video tag.   **&lt;video provider='netflix.com' player='net_player_1' media='dances_with_wolves'&gt;**  2. Browser sends request for specific implementation of video player (netflix's net_player_1) (signed binary). Somehow (closed source) the binary is digitally verified and run.  Perhaps Netflix would have a closed source plugin that would be called?  Dunno here; have to sketch it out some more.  3. The signed binary then asks the browser for proof that it is authorized to run the binary.  This is done by verifying digital signatures for each of the DLLs in the browser's binary folder (and those in memory) by sending them to some 3rd party server.  If all these pass muster the browser is considered legit and the binary will let itself be run.  The browser can be open source but must be white-listed by the content providers, which is fine.  4. The encrypted content is then streamed via the provider to the player which then plays the video unencrypted for users.  _This takes care of the problem of open-source browsers simply being able to copy image buffers to disk. The player has to trust the browser and the browser has to verify the player._  The problem now is as follows:  a) whether DLL signatures can be faked, bypassing the security check (this can be done with kernel level stuff).  b) whether kernel level hooks can be set, bypassing everything so far (AFAIK can also be done).  c) whether the closed source plugin can be decompiled for its validation key   Thus when running something like a video you'd need to lock out any hooks in the driver chain that access video/ram/audio unless they're signed by the company running the signed player.  This is where rootkits come in.  I'm a novice at this kind of thing and I'm not sure there's a perfect system to prevent piracy but what I _believe_ is that the social experiment called open-source software has ethical limitations.  People will inevitably, if slowly, start to slide down the slippery slope and creators will end up not be getting paid.  Edit: the concern of having HTML5 open source ends with the tag implementation.  The players, etc. would have to be closed to a certain extent.
gotcha. did not get that clearly from the previous statement, thank you. 
No welcome to the herd?  Well... er...  Welcome to the herd then!
I don't always assume direct control, but when I do, I float up in the air and give Shepard the perfect oppertunity to destroy my body. 
Those Christians are in danger of breaking their arms patting themselves on their backs.
I couldn't find any game that had people in it when I played so I plate with bots instead. I simply ran around without direction and whenever I saw someone that looked like an enemy I simply held down left mouse because there was so much ammo and do little damage done. The AI was so bad that I would empty half a clip into someone before they would even acknowledge my presence. All this is going on without audio because the game decided having functioning audio was overrated.
apps. say it again and die! fucking apps. 
why egg not spawn like chicken when click it goes cluck cluck but no hen then i try  with stick but caramel taste like pupcorn, and not when sprinkle berries try to escape like cat tamed with watermelon seeds in the desert biome. achievements?
I have heard good things about that DZ. It is a little far for me though, but I will see what my birthday plans are as the date gets closer. 
I love all sorts of vegetables. Raw broccoli, carrots, cucumbers cut in thin chip-like slices, etc etc.  Gotta watch that figure ;)
**Original Submission (95%):** [Snooki's pregnant?](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/qbjd3)   **Posted:** 5h before this post by *[UsernameTaken321](http://www.reddit.com/user/UsernameTaken321)* (fixed by *[eizano](http://www.reddit.com/user/eizano)*)  [This comment generated by an automated bot.](http://www.reddit.com/r/originalfinder/help/faqs/originalfinder) [*Is this match wrong?*](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=original-finder&amp;message=%2A%2AIncorrect+match%3A%2A%2A+http%3A%2F%2Fwww.reddit.com%2Fr%2Ffunny%2Fcomments%2Fqc00h%0A%0A%2A%2ACorrect+match%3A%2A%2A&amp;subject=Error%3A+qc00h)
also [/po/ archives](http://papercraft.wikidot.com/papercraft) 
Playing Portal 1 is important to understanding the relationship between the two major characters of the games. You could play Portal 2 without Portal 1, but the foundation of the games greatest strength would be lost on you.
Milk is disgusting. 
Yep, the NAACP took a vote and those two won. It was on BET just last weekend....really.....
"Ughhh, doing your.. son?"
Bringing it back old school, then a modern game.  I've played lots of crap games when I was a kid...  Dinowarz, Godzilla: Monster of Monsters, Motherfucking ***Bubsy,*** etc.  None of them compared to the sheer disappointment I felt after I "beat" 'The Bugs Bunny Crazy Castle' for GameBoy.  I spent days, what might even be weeks, pushing through one of the most frustrating games I had ever played (I was only 10 at the time, but I had some awesome games for GameBoy and NES).  I wrote down every password before I shut it off, so I could continue from that level.  Finally, after about 100 levels of garbage:  I did it.  I won.  I got to the end, and was met with Bugs Bunny doing squats, and the words:   CONGRATURATION!  YOU ARE GOOD PLAYER!  Yes, in Engrish...  roll credits, back to title.  I was so very angry about that.  Kind of still pissed, when I think about it.  ***Modern gaming:***  Hyperdimension Neptunia  Interesting concept (a JRPG about game consoles that are anthropomorphized as big-titty anime chicks).  *Terrible execution!*  The overall feeling I got playing it was boredom.  The dialogue was *almost* interesting.  You have no control over when you can heal yourself.  You do get healing items, but you can not ever actively use them.  Once the character's health is low enough, they *might* heal themselves.  It's totally random (but you can change the odds with experience, apparently, I never got that far), and can **only** happen *during battle.*  The combat was also incredibly confusing, and very, very s-l-o-w.  I don't mind a slower-paced game, but this was too much.  What a waste of money...
Oh man ESLR was one of the first stocks I ever bought and got burned on it. Penny stocks seemed like such a good idea after taking 1 finance class.
If bison ruled the world this would be their Terminator opening sequence. 
wait what?
Hugo
Allstate.
Hah! h
I've been jelly of all the pics all damn week. Tomorrow is finally the day for me to cop, but there's a small chance I will get drug tested on Monday so I can't party all weekend like I want, only Thursday. Gonna get me 20 bags of some NJ powder :D
I'm sick of that shit too. I like all this crossover stuff, it's artists expressing themselves. If there's a market and fans, there will always be good, traditional trance. I don't know what everyone is freaking out about.  There's this same kind of conflict in skateboarding (bear with me) about how everything is getting to mainstream and somehow that's going to ruin skateboarding. However, this conflict has been going on for 5-6 years so they're a little farther along: the more level-headed people in skateboarding know that skateboarding will always survive as long as theres still skateboarders that just skate around. Street Leaugue and the X-Games will never change anything about some kid in his driveway trying to kickflip.  As long as there are people who love and nurture traditional trance, it will survive. Prog House crossovers will not hurt trance producers who have a legitimate artistic vision that reflects traditional trance characteristics.
Can you imagine if he used his real name throughout his career? He might not have had one. 
Please explain.
They could be. You have to be a dealer to go the deal-only auctions. It's not cheap nor easy to become a car dealer. So, someone with a license could charge a fee and buy a car for you at auction.  With that said, I'd ask around and see if you can find a small dealer that might be willing to buy for you at auction for a fee (They might charge $200-$500+). Most probably won't unless you are a friend of a friend or something due to some potential financial risk.  I bought a salvage Trans Am online through a 3rd party website. I paid like 10% over the auction price.
Boethiah's Calling
My sister in law wouldn't allow toy guns either, until my nephew chewed his toast into a gun and started shooting. I have his first real gun in my safe waiting for his birthday. Its a nice little single shot 22 perfect for a 12 year old
As a Marquette fan, i would have to say Kentucky, UNC, and Florida St. All of these teams are very long and athletic, which would be a match-up nightmare for us. 
I dunno but she's probly a witch. Hexe is German for witch. 
Ah ok, thanks mate.
You're right, it isn't. Firehazurd made the idea for Moas, and then let King and the other producers of the Aether mod take his models and use them in their mod.  Edit: [Firehazurd's Idea](http://www.minecraftforum.net/topic/96970-moa-mob-suggestioncustom-graphic/) was formed December 11, 2010, while the [Aether Collaboration Mod](http://www.minecraftforum.net/topic/495374-173-aether-collaboration-mod-v102-new-mobs-fixes-items-and-features/) was posted July 23, 2011.
Hmm, I'm not so sure. It's very symbolic. And if it doesn't matter, why don't legislators abolish it?
This was actually on an episode of Destination Truth. I normally watch those shows to see how silly they can be, but this one was legitimately creepy.
I recall seeing this when it was created several years ago........its an art project.  http://www.fabianbrunsing.de/
This video is the funniest. It even says so, right in the title.
yeah, sorry about that.  I only found this sub today and didn't read all the rules otherwise I wouldn't have commented so much in the original thread.  oh well live and learn.
no your point was to say hipsters don't like mainstream music. lol!!!! GEDDIT? 
This is the first comment in this thread that I actually agreed with. Pizza and fruit do not mix. I never understood pineapple on pizza. 
&gt;the time it takes for a plant to grow will vary depending on how many times you log in and log out of the game  Wat. Never heard of this. Farming ticks are stored server side, and having nothing to do with whether your account logs out or not. 
Well I live in Michigan and I find it at every gas station I go to. Its distributed by the same people that make Monster energy drinks. On every peace tea can there is a hidden Monster energy drink symbol.
Lots of reasons, maturity level, life pressures ie work, money, study. But mainly I think it's the nature of the relationship if some pit up with a lot of crap they get a lot of crap, if another person tolerates no bullshit then it can stop the abuser in their tracks. On the other hand some people are just more annoying than other people.
reminds me of that Simpsons episode where Homer gets a gun, and he goes around shooting the light bulbs to turn them off. 
There's now a little icon of a person silhouette and a planet silhouette, clicking the planet supposedly turns off the personalized search.  Is that true, or is there still some filtering going on?
Actually I think the more liberal minded people listen to stuff like NPR or just regular stations. Up in Canada I almost exclusively listen to CBC radio unless I have my iPod on.
In California, the age of consent is 18. Considering they're both celebrities, I think it's pretty safe to assume that they spend most of their time in CA.
Because in hell the bacon will be all gristly fat and none of the good meat, that's why. ;) Oh well, as long as you intend to share the bacon.
I HATE THE WORD "KEURIG". I cringe.
&gt;Meanwhile, Arabic is in the Top3 most difficult ones.  This is a very ethnocentric post. I'm not surprised that it's coming from you.  You think a language that you're not familiar with easier to learn, while Western languages are superior in your eyes because you, a Westerner are more akin to that language group.
http://boards.420chan.org/mma/src/1325481412380.jpg
G_G
pretty sure its PVP based, WW sin blows PVM with many ppl
Was at this show...good times
Frozen juice too. Start with the concentrate and one or two cups of hot water from the tap.
Came here to type this.   Karmadog: preemptive strike-lvl 99. 
WWII called and asked why you didn't pay attention in history classes.
Not my thing.   At all.   Not even close. 
Good bobby driver bfv.
No, because he has negative -189 comment karma.  That is indicative of a troll.  I said this in response to a comment like yours earlier, guess you didn't have time to read that.  That's ok though. Anyways lather, rinse, repeat is a phrase or idiom roughly quoting the instructions found on many brands of shampoo. (Often the phrase is shortened to "Rinse and repeat".) It is a humorous way of pointing out that such instructions if taken literally would result in an endless loop of repeating the same steps, at least until you run out of shampoo. It is also a sarcastic metaphor for following instructions or procedures slavishly without critical thought.  In the book The Plagiarist by Benjamin Cheever, an advertising executive increases the sales of his client's shampoo by introducing the word "REPEAT" to its instructions.
Well played.
I don't know why you included facebook comments  but im glad you did  "that doesn't answer his question nigger fucker"
Upvoted because I agree. Mint/Chocolate is a deplorable combination. Fuck Thin Mints. 
Why can't people fill out a form without having to have it vetted by whoever just happens to be sitting at the front desk?  And why do they have to produce an ID to fill out a form?  You pose that question as if it has any relevance to whether a person should be able to file a complaint.
haha omg.. its really bad when youre playing air guitar (or if youre me pretending to play songs you dont know on guitar) and lip singing in the mirror.. and then someone walks in and asks what you were doing....
Oui, pour les spiritueux et terroirs d'ici je comprends, mais le vin qui vient de l'étranger? Ils peuvent le taxer de la même façon que le vin et bière qui est déjà dans l'épicerie. C'est quoi l'excuse là?
The problem of evil. I haven't found a satisfactory answer to this. Sometime in the near future, I intend to make a serious attempt at finding such an answer.
If he just keeps poking around he'll get it.
Looks at result : Whatever, friendly game. Looks at Italy's lineup : LOL. 
i dont understand it either, this is the same team that sign a 3 billion dollar TV deal w/ Time Warner, why are they being cheap now ?
Hawkeye is crazy athletic and his aim can be considered superhuman. Black Widow is super athletic but it's more to look good.
Just FYI it's already been posted at least [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/comments/qasst/so_this_popped_up_in_facebook_to_be_fair_the_guy/) and [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/atheism/comments/qbzdi/they_were_nice_enough_about_it_but_seriously_get/). Hence the lack of an excited response.
No because lol what an idiot you are. That's why.
aww thank you! I might..maybe if I can get my actual camera to start working (:
I won. I'm depressed.
Must is the wrong word.  Can or may is more appropriate (axiom 2 &amp; 6). I'm trying to show that an imperfect person MAY modify the perfect message.   As shown, the outcome is the guide if you assume a perfect source; however, the outcome by itself isn't a useful indicator in determining if there was a perfect source as men may create a good idea.  That's why they're imperfect and not always wrong.  It's also why God at the head is indistinguishable from no God at the head.   Furthermore, A person really has no way to know if the message has been modified (axiom 3), and what's worse they are expected to follow a modified message (axiom 5).  This is further compounded by changing the original source material (axiom 4), and the inability to know when the church falls into apostasy as they aren't allowed revelation for the church as a whole (axiom 7).
Rapiers are capable of slicing motions but you dont see it in spars  afterall there is a distinct desire to not kill your opponent in most fencing matches like people are used to
&gt;Delivering a baby is a very natural process that women have been doing forever  That is an appeal to nature fallacy and the sentiment you are expressing (it is a normal body function therefore medical staff need not be involved) is incorrect.  Childbirth is an incredibly dangerous process for both the mother and child.  In places which lack access to medical care, childbirth remains the foremost cause of death for women of reproductive age.
There are a fuck tonne of housing round here!  can't help you with a 1/1 though, I was looking to have house mates, though I do know that there are complexes that specifically cater for postgrads so you won't have to worry about a place with roudy undergrads!   Hope you find what you need!
Ron Paul is from the south, just fyi.
And I mean that in a non subjective way time-wise. 
UNH. However, I know a ton of people at Uconn.
works for me...good part's around 3:50
Shut up, shut UP!
They've never released community mods as DLC, but they have added purchasable and downloadable player homes.  [Here's a list of what they did with Oblivion](http://www.uesp.net/wiki/Oblivion:Official_Plug-ins).  As you can see, a lot of the smaller plugins were player homes.
Hell ya, I ain't blind!!
[Do it again o great wizard of the west!](http://4.bp.blogspot.com/_6jSCtuQ-LzA/SB9c3bm9CQI/AAAAAAAAB3E/5-fCu-bgBpI/s400/wolf%2Bpelts.jpg)
So many posts about Snooki.. That's cute, OP. Does someone have a wittle crush? d'awwwwwwwww.
when i lived with my parents i found my mom sleep walking on ambien. she had tried to eat a mini orange without peeling it and ravaged the side of it and was sucking out the meat/juice from a small hole. i lead her back to her room and told her to go to sleep and she just leaned forward and face planted into the bed. my dad and i found it hilarious.
Looks like I need to speak to my mother more often... *Sigh*
Also I remember reading this somewhere in SSM or an article regarding the series, but when GRRM sat down with the HBO people to discuss the setting and scenery when he saw the plans for the Wall he realized how excessive 700 feet is.  Vertically 700 feet is a hard measure to imagine or visualize.
&gt; Added captcha verification for increased security.   Why? I hate those things.   &gt; Users can now hide games in their Game Library.   This I like, I can finally hide the alpha and beta versions of BF3 that are completely useless. 
My biggest hope is that they make the other people living there more fun, and more able to be interacted with, instead of quest giving zombies
I read that as "9.21 Jiga Bytes!?!"
Lol @ Knarr
badgers... badgers?! we don't need no stinkin BADGERS!?   on a serious note though... your story makes me want one more than ever now. 
It's def revenge against cats.
Are you sure it wasn't [Ramblin' Man](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1x28jaeyX2s)?
Current teacher... and I know exactly what you're talking about.  It's the "Fuck you, I know more than you do" look.  Except they don't. And it's something they show/prove over time.  It's particularly endemic to kids in AP courses who think that simply by virtue of being in one or more AP classes that they're somehow better than those who are not...even though many schools offer such classes on an open enrollment basis.  Hubris catches up with them more often than not. 
&lt;3______&lt;3   That is one the coolest screenshot I've seen so far. So many people!
“Citizens may resist unlawful arrest to the point of taking an arresting officer's life if necessary.” Plummer v. State, 136 Ind. 306.  "One may come to the aid of another being unlawfully arrested, just as he may where one is being assaulted, molested, raped or kidnapped. Thus it is not an offense to liberate one from the unlawful custody of an officer, even though he may have submitted to such custody, without resistance." (Adams v. State, 121 Ga. 16, 48 S.E. 910).
My favorite is when they can't fit their tongue in their mouth.
If this game came out for iOS and android and used barcodes and qr codes instead of CDs my god I would throw so much money at the devs
something tells me you are trolling, who buys cars that often?  btw women aren't a minority, there are more women in the US than men
This is /r/wtf not /r/funny This is not wtf at all.
it's not who you know, but who you blow
Kenjii worked at cooks illustrated - you can still catch him on reruns of america's test kitchen. They test like crazy.   Not saying I wouldn't like him to do it himself for serious eats, but...the training comes from the very place you put down, which is a little weird. 
Ha Ha. We have a really nice, state of the art looking service area/lab that has windows so clients can see it from the lobby....but only the grunts hang out there most of the time doing repetitive repairs. The senior engineers and corporate officers offices all dump into the room in the picture. It used to be a conference room but we moved all that shit out of the way and made it into a space we could tinker on projects and hang out together. If you can't tell from all the two way radio equipment lying around, that is what we do. We are in communications technology. Two way radios for industrial and public safety, e911 dispatch centers, VoIP phone systems, industrial networking, cell carrier contract work, communications tower construction and maintenance,  security for prisons and jails...just anything wireless, low voltage, or data intensive that we can make a buck on without dealing with the general public.  Interesting side note. That Lapp variable voltage DC power supply in the pictures is one of the original prototypes for an iconic piece of equipment. We had another exactly like it but someone found out we had them and now the other one is in the Smithsonian. 
And yet the police have fought tooth and nail to defend the stance that they are not *obligated* to protect anybody.
Too poor.
Actually no sorry disregard that, at a glance I thought it was an M9. double checked and I was mistaken, sorry.
THAT CAT KNOWS WHATSUP WITH SOME OBJECT PERMANENCE, SON!!!
I use octagonal. I prefer the equal throw distance.
Unfortunately, this has been removed for the following reasons:  * You did not include the image's resolution in the title. You should put the resolution in brackets at the end of your title. * The image is not hosted by an approved host.  For more information regarding these issues please see the FAQ on the sidebar to the right, and feel free to resubmit once they have been resolved. Thank you!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%23VillagePorn) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Have access to all the information in the universe. Nothing unknown or secret. God mind... Find all the hidden treasure in the world. Answer any question with certainty, and have all the insider trading info you will ever need. Know of all plots against you the instant they are hatched and know the truth in every person's heart. Rule the world basically...
You know he does. 
saying someone looks like an ape isn't ill intent? 
It seems to. I've remapped the spacebar to the scroll wheel on the mouse. Death seems to come a lot more slowly when I scroll.
No offense is taken beyond the argument you present, and that offense is one based on reason, not emotion.  I hold nothing against you and value the discussion your question has elicited.  Sleep well.
I worked for an electrical contractor in NYC that serviced the traffic signals. The push buttons that say push to cross are not hooked up to anything ,nothing at all,you can spend your time pushing those buttons until hell freezes over and they won't do anything. I know I installed them not a one of them in the entire city is connected.
I was making a poop joke that only fancy people would laugh at.  I just checked again though, and *Fountain* was a urinal rather than a toilet, so I guess I failed.
Personally.... I find black females more attractive than whites.  And I'm pretty fucking white.
Twiced baked potatoes. Easy enough to look up a recipe, but a lazy way to do it is just to not scoop it back into the skins in the last step, put it in one dish.
I should ask her seeing as I only have immigrant ones that would not stand such horror.
Check Beretta's website?
Pretty much what you said OP...I just don't get chocolate plus mints.  THEY JUST DON'T GO TOGETHER. It is two different sweet things...completely...that simply don't compliment each other.
I hope you made that poor pussy ache from those clothespins. We need to get those panties much deeper into that wet pussy, young lady.
From what I've seen, public Accounting at Big 4 has a couple of outcomes. You start off as staff, and work you way up, usually in about 3 years to make senior. At that point, you either work towards partner, where, once you achieve it, you are allowed to buy into the company. Alot of people who make Senior, however, begin looking at exit strategies. They keep in contact with businesses that they have interacted with through their career in Public Accounting, as well as clients, just getting to know the lay of the land and different industries, essentially mapping out a path for their future career.  As for what I do, I graduated with a bachelors degree from a 4 year university, and happened to live in a city with big Energy influence. I looked around, and more came across the job by luck through a contact. Mind you, they started me off at the bottom of the totem poll, simply confirming deals between different counter-parties, but I have since moved on to tracking inventory, handling invoices, and just getting a general feel for the majority of how the back office here operates, and an understanding on how trading works, along with different strategies for positioning oneself in the markets.  A person with 3 years of audit experience at a big 4 firm doesn't exactly have the same type of insight that I might into the ebb and flow of a Back to Mid to Front office of a trading firm, commodities or otherwise. As for exit opportunities for me, I wouldn't see a move from my trading firm to a larger one as an exit, as essentially, you are staying in the same industry, and the industry experience transfers much better than non-industry experience.  Not only that, but if you have aspirations to continue towards your CPA out of college, it is very doable. Many companies see the benefit of having a CPA on their payroll, and are willing to make the investment in you through not only hiring and training you, but also helping you via grad tuition and study programs for the CPA exam.  From what I have heard, smaller to mid-sized firms have more specializations in specific industries, but their staff ends up alot more involved in the process, rather than just going down a checklist for selected documents to be audited.  I hope this made a bit of sense  Disclaimer: I am biased in favor of my opinion, and, as with any endeavor, it is always a good idea to get as many perspectives as possible to try to get a more clear picture of the real thing.
Salads with olives, shredded cheese, sliced/chopped bell peppers, and whatever else you have around are THE BEST munchies food.
Why the hell is this downvoted?  One of the better comments.
The boobies are on the front, they are silver.
Perhaps it's an Indian/Hindu concept (a lot of the articles I found are India-based) but the way I understand is that you take pride in any job you do (anything doing is worth doing well) and you should afford respect to those working i.e. not mock them for doing their jobs. Certainly something that got drilled into me as a kid, and something I realized on my own later. Here're some links   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dignity_of_Labour  http://www.deccanherald.com/content/24246/dignity-labour.html  http://www.preservearticles.com/201103174592/the-dignity-of-labour-essay.html
If you wander through cities, guards and towns people comment how you're wearing the "armor of the Thieves Guild" and "I'm watching you".
I like the Troublemaker's Tosslecap.  It's not really intrusive, but it's still a big enough difference so that you feel it adds something.
It depends on the mood. I indicate the mask mostly, I think.
I hate square d panels. 
New photos
Stick them in car exhaust.
Yeah, its going to make the time by even slower somehow though I already know...
The Troll Toll
Is it just me, or is he holding a portal gun in his right hand?
EAT THEM.  EAT THEM ALL
In OP's defense, it's the kind of joke that many people probably came up with independently.  It's like when that killer whale killed the trainer at Seaworld.  Uncountable jokes popped up simultaneously that were virtually identical.
So true when I first started playing with redstone. Lol.
* Go deploy an EOD bot and find the longitude and latitude of your position.  * Enter coordinates into Google Earth  * Be amazed.
YOU CAN ALSO SEE SHE'S WEARING A TANK TOP, SO YOU CAN IMAGE THE CLEAVAGE. BLATANT EXPLOITATION
You know what's really hard to twist into a reason for genocide...science.
This very thing happened to me.  It was awkward.  
Course he didn't, otherwise hed be on dat 4th cake day
Don't have Uni tomorrow, so I should be able to get there!
Fuck! I was just drinking water!  Thanks Hitler for being such a fucking buzzkill.
Salty salty tears! [slurping sound] 
A search for wave-washed lighthouses around Chile and Argentina didn't find me anything that looked like the one from the video, but the design appears to be somewhat similar to the Bell Rock lighthouse near Scotland.  You can read an account of it's construction on [Wikipedia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bell_Rock_Lighthouse#Construction) or, if you can find a copy of the BBC documentary "Seven Wonders of the Industrial World" there's a great episode in there about it.
the same happened to me, I wasn't even a choice, after a week they took the risk and gave me the opportunity .. now my bosses like me and even better, i'm one of their favorites employees. 
i don't remember anything consciously from that time in my life. 
Props to you. My wife bought me the first 50 issues she found in a goodwill. Someone just gave 'em away! cannot believe it. 
That's adorable. Someone repost this to /r/aww
Don't yell at me, I didn't come up with the idea.  I actually submitted a reason why it COULDN'T be used like this.
*golf clap*
I think my he blew my mind, and it was rebooting, so it seemed...actually, I'm not sure
Partly because the game hasn't reached stateside yet.
Watching it back, it looked like he was given a boon, every time he attacked the number went down. My guess is no duration or long duration, but limited use. That's how it appeared, anyway
As a Dutchman I can do nothing but facepalm at this crap some of our politicians and 'diplomats' are throwing out there to gain votes from the retard-majority that plays such a key role in democracy these days.  Apologies- the Dutch people are not behind this faggot (no homophobia intended) and it's a bit silly to connect what he says to the pursuit of diplomacy.   TL;DR He's an idiot- we're down with Eastern Europe.
oh please, glow in the dark stars are awesome! I need to go get some
I wouldn't mind at all. The students would be perplexed and ask why there was a t on the board. 
Sounds like whoever wrote that already has blame damage.
*Slow Clap*
Yeah, I practically had a heart attack just looking at this... my friends somehow convinced me to go rappelling in Argentina, and that was "only" 30 feet or so high... NEVER AGAIN.
hahaha, I am amused.   I want to get a set of these: "honk if Hitler was bad"  I can't wait to stick them on my friend's cars! Haha, i sure got them!
I'd play that.
... they've changed every album
They both are the most obnoxious fan bases in American sports. 
I just started reading FO:E (~420 pages in so far), but I have to agree with you.  Jetfire writes some amazing fics, but Kklatt has him beat.  [](/b07 "That said, why do people hate on Cupcakes and clop, but praise this one so highly? It's extremely gory and dark, and chapter 20.5 is described as a ''borderline clopfic'' on EqD. Not that I'm opposed to either, but a lot of bronies are.")
&gt;apparently psychopaths become cops these days.  You didn't hear? The budget was cut and they've actually started paying officers in *violence*.
If you do go with Apache you can use `mod_alias` and then have something like this   AliasMatch ^/(.*) &lt;path to html files&gt;/$1.html  This would be a very, very simple way to do the matching. If someone goes to `mysite.com/&lt;whatever&gt;`, what you will show them is `&lt;whatever&gt;.html` in the path you gave it. So, for example, if you set have a link with `href=/downloads`, then the server will deliver `downloads.html` whenever it's clicked and the URL will remain as just `/downloads` because that's what was requested. You don't need to rewrite the urls themselves.
just like the naked man, it works 2 out of 3 times
There are several game endings that I have enjoyed throughout the years some people might QQ and bitch and moan about some of them but In not particular order:  The Silent Hill 2 Endings   Final Fantasy 8  Zelda: A Link to the Past.  Star Wars: Knights of the Old Republic.  Metal Gear Solid 3.
Awesome
I've never used ear protection and now have Tinitus.  :(
In most of the world, gasoline is **way** more expensive than in the US.  Seriously, about the only exceptions are oil-producers like Venezuela, Saudi Arabia, et al.  The biggest reason is taxes.  Most countries have way higher gas taxes than in the US.  I'm a Canadian living in southern California; right now, regular here is about $4.35/USgal, or about $1.15/L.  Back in British Columbia, it's $1.25-$1.35.  In Europe, it's double or triple that.  $4/USgal gasoline is **not** expensive, by any stretch of the imagination.  TWIAVBP
I concur.
I dunno, but when I get someone pregnant,  My child will be born on this day.
Fake tan?
M1 Garand. I am in the process of acquiring parts for a .308 build and I've been reading through Garand books. I also gotta say it's one my favorite firearms that's ever been created. I'm also a WWII firearms enthusiast, so of course it'll appeal to me. I'm gonna try and acquire a real .30-06 Garand in the next few years as well. I also have a whole list of what to get regarding WWII rifles.
I've only read a few but they're good.  Not as good as the show but definitely worth reading.  I've been meaning to catch up on those myself.
The weather sucks but its on and off. For example today, in what is technically still February, it was 70 degrees and sunny.   Just like any major city there are nice parts and shitty parts. My only gripe is I wish we took more advantage of our waterfronts.  Public transportation exists but I don't really utilize it. Rush hour traffic is nothing compared to other biggish cities so while it would save me some money I prefer the convenience.   Hands down the best part of living in Cleveland is the cost. You have all the amenities of bigger cities and a fraction of the price. Art, music, food, sports, culture, nightlife... its all there. And $1000/month can get you a beautiful apartment in a safe neighborhood whereas in other big cities that would get you something very low end.   I'm looking to get out because the particular field I'm trying to break into has more opportunities elsewhere. But that is by no means a knock against the city. The only real difference between Cleveland and your Ny's, SF's, LA's etc... is that there is no prestige to living here. And yet if you walked around on Saturday night you find everybody doing pretty much exactly what the people in those bigger cities are doing. 
you know what the say...the best kind of incest is real incest 
Mmm  Your comments say 'no', but your upvotes say 'GOD yes'.  A weird trend I've been seeing on Reddit.
you did good.
I upvoted you because I'd thought, you'd pretty much have to be a dick to downvote a guy just asking for input on a thesis paper. r/history has a pretty clear culture against doing peoples homework for them, but nothing you did here seems to violate that.  However, you will have a pretty hard time getting interest in any of this. Cultural history is always a tough row to hoe. It's a bit easier in say, my field, where native american cultural practices tend to have more relevancy to a more subsistent lifestyle.  However, the more laterally grown a society becomes, the more the cultural practices of the rich begin to look like pure foppery. You're going to have to look at it this way. In three hundred years would you write the paper about the sudden emergence of custom gold plated dental caps or "grills". There actually is a history there, you could take off from that and get into black culture, rap culture, etc...  It's just...who cares?  You need to be able to relate any of it to things people who care about. Hairstyles and some kind of class revolution in France. Better. Etc... Etc...
You know how some say that people die because they have no reason to live? I think he has plenty to live for.
Yeah, that food isn't going to the people of north korea...it's going to the leader of north korea...
I grew on on and surrounded by cattle farms, I can't say I've ridden a cow. However, I'm sure some of my friends have on those festive Friday nights.
So a week later, what are the chances that this is going to happen?
Better yet, who the hell did he steal it from?
That's what you get for having wings, *asshole*.
Beef with Pineapple somehow became popular here
I like that idea actually.
TL note: "kamisama" means "God"
I'm so conflicted now. I initially planned on just getting the smart cover but now I'm not so sure. I had my phone in an Otterbox Commuter but I dropped it so much that the case cracked. The phone was still in perfect condition but I opted to upgrade to the Defender which I've come to love.  While I think the likelihood of me dropping an iPad is much slimmer I'm now worried. I just really like the look and functionality of the smart covers. How are cases for the back that work along with smart covers?
they're not
I truly believe he's the best, I just didn't want to get into some petty argument with someone who didn't agree with me, haha.
I understand your frustration at a lack of rigid structure, and you make a good point that without some sort of rule set within the world-building the writers could get lazy. However I think you may be misunderstanding  the show itself.   It's not hard sci-fi, nor does it ever pretend to be. It's really a character show that explores concepts of humanity through the use of a sci-fi device (time travel and aliens). The time travel adds adventure and mystery, and sometimes social commentary, to keep things lively. But the time travel is there as a supporting element to character exploration and development.  As such, the specific details of how the TARDIS and time travel work become much less relevant when you're engaged with the story.   There are some rules, which are revealed as the show progresses. It's not as though the writers just chuck all quality and continuity, going willy nilly with the story structure. There's also the argument that withholding some of the specifics of how things work (a) keeps some mystery for the audience so they don't burn out after a few seasons, and (b) allows the writers enough freedom to expand the world in the future.
And it kinda looks like him too.
Feel sorry for you.
I'll give you another comment :) Don't let the silence keep you down.
I'm thinking of custom or semi custom 1911's, the ones that are under 1000 are not fine examples of what can be done.   To avoid a flame war, we can argue all day that your Rock Island is "FLAWLESS" but it is not a well built machine that was inspected, honed and meticulously hand made, thus not correct to the analogy. "The 1911 is an aficionado's weapon, and still has a place in the modern arsenal for those who are dedicated to it. With proper setup and maintenance, the 1911 can serve you like no other weapon." -Hilton Yam
[](/rdsad) Yeah, for some reason is seems like America is pretty short on the Pony supply.  We have plenty of Brushables, and those creepy baby pony abominations, but the blindbags always seem to be in short supply.  I guess it's just our luck that the most show-accurate toys they make are also the hardest to find.
You do need a server to host a website, and you probably should become familiar with the basics of the concept if you want to try anything. 
I'm in California and I call it chaser.  It doesn't really make sense to differentiate. "Oh you're using that generic soda to chase your liquor, can I have some to put in my drink?"   So to the one person it would be a chaser, to the other person it would be a mixer, but it is still the same thing.   I'll concede that mixer and chaser are different terms and not the same thing, but I use them interchangeably and there is no confusion.
A gun, knife, flashlight, wallet, phone, and keys.  Check out /r/edc. 
I'm partial to the M1 Abrams getting a piece of a chopper with the main gun.  Some dumbass was circling me at low altitude at B on Caspian Border when I gave him a serving of 120mm pie.  The canister shell is easy to tag a chopper with though, even at long range.
You forgot to mention Troll 2's [amazing choreography.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7oTkqgykkQ8&amp;feature=youtube_gdata_player) 
At *taco*bell....
MO NAKED HOES
I suppose so. I hate feeling ignorant and unlearned. thanks for the warm welcome!
Sorry, no comparison comics.  
&gt; I guess I need to read those...  There's no need to guess. If you have an interest in this issue, then you need to read these papers.  &gt; ...but Wikipedia concludes:  You just caused me to die a little inside, and I am not a non-person :(  &gt; ...which just brings up the next question: is it acceptable to kill non-persons?  This seems to be a separate issue.
Yah.  It would be cheaper, more efficient, and more intellectually honest to just roll a die.  1-5: nope. 6: interview.  Or as the not-really-a-joke goes: Toss away half the applicant letters immediately.  We don't hire unlucky people.
Through your misforutne, and the misfortune of others in this thread, people may be able to pull their head out of their ass for just a moment to realize maybe we arent as bad off as we thought. Thanks for the attitude ajustment.  My condolences about your family, and congradulations on ridding your life of 2 more worthless individuals.  Ive had similar( but not nearly as bad) occurences befall me and each one made me stronger, the person i am today. Hopefully from this tradgedy you can gain some character strengths.  Good day
I'm a campus-area resident. Underrated: The Mason (S Park St) - great beer list!  Just Right: Jordan's Big Ten  Overrated: (not a bar, but a beer) Spotted Cow - there are tons of great microbrews around here, and SC isn't even in the top half in my opinion.  Also Overrated: Brocach on the square - Food is tolerable, beer is all plain-jane imported stuff available at any gas station, decor is too fakey for my tastes
But Ishtar ain't one. 
Fuck those greddy bastards on Wall Street. Don't they make enough money already?
http://www.leisuretown.com/library/qac/index.html
If there are gangs you must have a gang task force with your local police department. You can ask to talk with one of them and see what they suggest.  Second option (and the more sensible one) is to become a chemistry master and deal with the gang like Walter White would. 
Sure was. Up here in Canada we even have a display in the provincial museum in Alberta that explains it all, with this very picture blown up. The government had a bounty for each bison skull collected, which is why all the skulls are in one place in this picture.  EDIT: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/American_bison#19th-century_bison_hunts
But I don't so
how the fuck is the NSFL? this morning I saw a guys head flop open hot dog style and then closed back up. thats NSFL, this hardly even stands a chance as your basic WTF
As evidence mounts that the U.S. economy is improving, President Obama's detractors in the conservative media have been reduced to fits of denial.  That the economy is improving is NOT in question.
For example, a common claim is that electric grid require either government ownership or regulation to ensure open access to competing electric companies to avoid monopolies.
God, there are some in Amy butlers latest line that look like a cats ass.  Nice site though.
Pro tip: If you don't know how many "o"s to use, just write "2" instead.
Mine, too. I saw Debbie Gibson open for them at a free outdoor concert when I was around 10 years old. Not sure if I should have mentioned that first part or not.
you're cute! love the hair :)
Canadian here. I've never met an American I couldn't relate to, but Americans as a group? Well I think about you in kinda the same way "K" from Men in Black describes "people". "A person is smart. People are dumb, panicky dangerous animals and you know it."  My biggest concern about the US is how deeply divided it's people are on nearly every issue that matters. Much &lt;3 for my friends to the South, here's hoping you can reach out to each other and meet halfway.
Yes, its clean. Sorry should have said that.
This really does not constitute as power metal...
I know I'm shooting myself in the foot here but to be honest all the games that have been part of the humble bundle thing so far. I'll continue to support, but damn are the games ever so bad, and I don't understand how everyone on Reddit goes crazy over 'em, like I can't even last more than 5 minutes before saying "fuck it, i'm done".
I went to a kava ceremony where the host was going to make dinner afterwards. He asked the people that would be eating to bring money. However he did so by sending everyone a text saying "bring 5 clams"   So one guy showed up with 5 actually clams, which were then incorporated into the meal   Good times
Now I'm reminded of [this.](http://www.prequeladventure.com/)
I really love that first picture, but like prairielily mentioned, I don't think my hair in the front is long enough for something like that yet. However, that being said, that's like the cutest haircut i've ever seen. Thanks so much:)
Whatever bro, you seem to be the expert on 13 your old dicks so I will tag you as "13-year old cockmaster."  You seem to be stupid as fuck and you probably smoke brick weed.
It just an example used to further my point -.-
Not necessary. It's a good joke.
Here's my problem with oil speculation. Let's say gas is $3.50. Let's pretend that if not for tensions with Iran, it would be $2.50, so tensions are worth a dollar. Let's pretend this goes in for a week.   Then let's pretend after a week the crisis is somehow solved an the US, Iran and Israel become best friends.   The following week, gas prices should drop to $1.50 since the public was overcharged for a week by $1 for a confrontation that never happened. But what would happen is gas would drop to $2.50. Essentially someone pocketed the extra dollar for a week.   A simplified hypothetical to be sure but that's what it seems like happens to the general public and the original purpose of Wall Street is to allow companies to raise capital, not for investors to scam the economy. 
&gt;Well according to him, his views make perfect sense...   That pretty much explains all that needs explaining, right there.
Try actually reading what he says before continuing to spout the same crap.  &gt;HIM: They absolutely DON'T have the right to impose their beliefs on other people or to deny other people their rights. &gt;YOU: Yes, they do. They have freedom to practice their beliefs, no matter how absurd we may find them.   Religions absolutely do not have the right to infringe on others. It's the first amendment.
Are you headed to the scrimmage tonight?   If so be sure to post pics and let us know how it goes
Nebraskan here and I can safely say we did the same thing.
I can appreciate that -- I've always liked Wendy McElroy's (a feminist who often critiques feminism itself) point about how feminism's problem is that there's a sort of "feminist orthodoxy" taught as undeniable fact in gender studies classes, and people who buy completely into it often wind up supporting somewhat misandrist goals without realizing it.   Regardless, too often both see the flaws in the other and extrapolate to the whole, rather than trying to have an reasonable dialog and work towards mutually beneficial solutions.
It was like fireworks!
They also have a thousand tv shows (propaganda) that repeat the narrative that cops care, that its so hard they have to cut corners to get the bad guys, and that they are entitled and right to do it.  
Holy fuck I can't breathe! mfjgg88je3kijr3
Didn't matter. I tried it both ways with the same results.
I have you tagged as "Hasn't been wrong yet"
They definitely are different people by comparison. I don't want to sound like I'm championing F/SN - more like championing F/Z, which I am alright with - but I think that made a lot of sense. I think Kirei's complete lack of passion, ethics, and morality is what makes him so threatening in Zero - he is almost exactly the same person as Emiya, but with zero ideal. I think Kirei's interest in Emiya is that he sees himself in him - they are both willing to do horrible, evil things and act callously without regard for ethics or honor. What will end up happening is that the two will face each other and Kirei will be shocked and disappointed to learn the truth - that Emiya is so truly opposed to him.  So that breaks his newly found passion. Then the war itself and his ultimate loss breaks his spirit and dulls his abilities and mental state so the person we see in Stay Night is nearly manic in his malevolence when he comes into his role as a villain - a far cry from his sociopathic glory.  Comparisons like that are what make Stay Night kind of lame to me, though. Between the two, Zero is like this amazing epic poem level war between thoroughly human characters who all have a great stake and represent massive, powerful institutions - for the most part. Then, next generation all of the powerful families have lost their powerful members and are dying out, and no one who's left either has much power or the proper training to do anything, so the conflict ends up just being an aftershock of the previous one - and Kirei's ultimate loss seems to just be so long in the making, Shirou being an instrument of his father's will in destroying his opponent after his own death. 
&gt;Yes, ask big daddy to take away women's vote you and control the riots that follow.  You think we'd ask?  No, men don't ask, they tell.  And with enough strong men to lead, women and other men follow.  &gt;The right in american want a corporatist healthcare system. They also tend to vote for less tax for the rich. So either way you are getting corporatism.  There are some truths in there and some misconceptions.  What I'll say is that government encourages and enables corporations to do evil things while limiting what the *people* can do to stop them.  The true danger is when government and corporations get together to screw over the people.  The government's sole purpose should be to protect liberty and property rights, and allow people to choose for themselves which corporations they wish to deal with.  At least with corporations, people can stop buying their product immediately.  With the government, and the bogus two-party system in the US especially, the people really have no way to stop buying the government's product other than revolution.  And government is absolutely terrible at regulating corporations, we've seen that, it's crystal clear.  All the government does is make things worse overall.  &gt;If men can organise and act in their own interests, instead of fighting with each other and / or being focused on what women are doing or not doing, they can achieve anything, I'm pretty sure of it.  I agree.  And that's what my goal is: to show men how.  And that means men have to understand what's true and what's a lie.  They have to understand how men and women are different.  They have to understand how the government really works.  And they have to understand that if they really want things to change, they'll have to BE the change they want.  Because that's the only way things will change.  And it certainly helps if they have resources available to show them how, as in the manosphere.
Why don't you try making an argument instead of more of this useless commentary?  Or hey, call me a troll again when I'm the only one even attempting a debate here. Seems to be the go-to response for people who have nothing of real substance to add.
Well, if "insulting the OP, boasting without proof and then acting butthurt when people call you out" is your idea of a discussion, then your opinion might not be of interest to most people.
Fhcvhhb vhdyjii
Perfect Blue is amazing and I highly recommend it.
At least she has the courage and conviction to like her own psychotic, unintelligible rant.
They also wore flannel shirts and beanies BEFORE they were cool.
He ATE a mountain lion?  I've never heard of that.
I thought this was awesome!  Sadly, Iron Flesh isn't as good as it used to be. :(
:: goes to click link ::  &gt; askprincessmolestia   [](/c28)
Right, it's the same as the difference between Fallout 3 and New Vegas. They're not the same kind of game.
Good guy nutella eater. 
This is a pretty solid playlist.  Good work.
As long as you can crack your back, I'm ok with them.
[I call it, burning nug.](http://i.imgur.com/JQFSI.jpg)
[Kascha (NSFW)](http://www.freeones.com/html/k_links/Kascha/)  [Source](http://rapidgator.net/file/541718/kascha_Sexy_Asian_Fucked.avi.html)
The unforgiving streets of Drexel have made me an angry mean biker! I am also an unfashionable efficient robot engineer. When the weather is nice I am a pretty active cyclist as well.  It's not just one guy, it's everyone slowly tooling around on a fixie that piss me off. Sorry. Just give yourself some room when you're behind a car. Have a nice day!
I liked Xbox before it was popular.
Think what ever. Has far has im concerned your only a poor raider and im one of the best minor in the server and also one of the ritchest. Im rich bitch
Revis had a great year in 2009, almost as good as the year Charles Woodson had.  I'm not sure why you think that because he had the 2nd best year of anyone at his position back in 2009 that he is the greatest of all time, but it sounds to me like you are a Jets homer.
absolutely. there's a place for everything, and everything in its place. never cross the streams.
i still think there is a good reason to cache it all, mostly to keep reads off of the db. indeed, the "bigger" the data, the more i want it cached.   using this approach, i can keep my master free for writes and replication, and slaves are also keeping up with replication. i've kept 80% of reads off of the db, and thats the low estimate. this is exactly why memcache exists
You bring up some really good points.  Someone else mentioned it briefly that Rush and Conquest are **very** different.  I have no qualms about saying that ***spot spamming* is an essential gunner skill in each mode.**  The difference, however, is that in 64man Conquest, the whole map is available for spotting so you have to be a little more precise.  Now it gets personal: My go-to pilot is a damn good shot from long range with rocket pods.  We usually engage from max-range wherein having extra zoom on the main cannon is essential.  This is also where TV missiles come in handy as well.  Running *Zoom* allows me to be effective at max-range, whereas without zoom I'm only playing the guessing game and getting lucky splash damage hits.  I'm not sure how relevant max-range is in Rush - admittedly I don't play enough of that mode. Working from max-range also allows us to better spot missile trajectory so that I can either kill the source or we can evade.  I suppose it helps that we're in constant communication.  (Edit for clarity: Max-Range is the maximum distance of a TV Missile).  When we do move in to directly engage or PTFO, it comes down to coordination, practice, and piloting to keep alive.  Whether you're buying time with zoom or flares, I think it just depends on your pilot/gunner and play-style.
A moment of silence for this poor soul.
Cost?
[what about this?](http://wharble.com/sites/default/files/Popeye_Candy_Cigarettes.jpg)
They signed up and have been trained in the use of firearms. If they don't have the nerve to be in the possession of a deadly weapon and be able to judge when a situation requires using it and when one does not, they should not be in possession of one.  They killed someone and have to emotionally deal with it. Think about the family who has to emotionally deal with the fact that their son was eating a pear and the officer thought it was a grenade.
Whoops sorry. Edited the post but it's around $1200. The parts currently up there will cost about $950. Like I said I already have the HDDs($55 and $130) and Motherboard($150)
Troll Warlords need corpses to raise skeletons. Corpses exist, they just aren't very visible.
I'm a doctor, tell the person not to kiss you on the mouth while you have sex. bite shoulders and nibble necks instead, then get in a position where your head is facing away from his (reference!) have a good night
Thanks. I'll have to switch the fan around then and most likely rescrew my motherboard in.
The issue wasn't "are both sufficient for household needs", it was "which is better in the war of cats vs dogs".
http://i.imgur.com/DCyS4.gif
I really glad you two are still friends; only a truly awful person would be mad at that dude for misunderstanding
Now I understand why people cry out for wtf to return to its roots. Why the living hell is this in WTF?!
Saw this last week at the Portland International Film Festival...   Over the previous week and a half, I'd seen 14 other movies, enjoyed most, and even loved some of them.  THIS was the first movie that REALLY got to me. This film got under my skin in a way that I find difficult to express. I just got off of a 16 hour shift and I'm exhausted but: in short, I thought it was brilliant, and I highly recommend it. 
Pembroke Welsh Corgis.  Why?  they're impossibly cute; also smart, tenacious, playful, loyal, excellent guard dogs, and are hilariously nosey little critters.  Cons - shed like crazy, very vocal, and (ours) hate other dogs. 
Some men just want to watch the wool burn.
YES! Fuck pulp. That shit is so fucking gross.
Part of my misgivings towards the investment (into a Mac) is that people who really love them seem to make things sound too good to be true so I end-up becoming skeptical; but I do appreciate your perspective and I'm leaning towards giving one a shot when the new 2012 Mac product line-up is released. Only time will tell if I'm glad that I made the investment.
I cannot give you enough upvotes for this.
i gotta ask.....what's his character's name?
I read up on it and it is a good low carb food if it's plain.  I think mine has 4 grams of carbs for every 5ozs.  Which is more than I would give myself for a serving anyway.  This also lists a couple grams of sugar however apparently there's not really any sugar as its used up in the fermentation...so I read anyway.  I think if you stay under 30-40 grams of carbs a day you'll still be in ketosis.  So in my book it's fair game.
My cousin Michael.
Albert Einstein. Because he's Albert Fucking Einstein.
I think pretty much any job is better than unemployment.  At least this way you can get a (hopefully) awesome reference about your work ethic for future positions you may apply for after you get your degree.  And you can always keep looking for something "better" while you work at McDonald's.
That's what she said.
I would watch the shit outta that.
One does not *joke* about a Nokia.   That stuff you hear is pure, benevolent truth.   Last year, I found one that I had used in highschool. Graduated 2005, by the way. I held the power button and it freakin' turned on.   I see all these smartphone users constantly scrambling to find a place to plug in their charger; I charged my Nokia once every two weeks. There's *smart*, and then there's *wise*.
If it was any other discipline maybe but this is maths. Unless this was a discussion about Fermat or Goldbach he should know his bloody Pythagorean theorem, [a theory whose origins are over 4,000 years old and has remained unchanged from its common algebraic form since ~500BC.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pythagorean_theorem#History)  Stupid high school kids are a problem obviously but that usualy boils down to "I'll never use this" not "I claim to have absolute historical knowledge on something I cannot demonstrate any knowledge of because *science is a lie*"
some gifs NSFW
made what as an adult?
WHO is the Bancandy of XBOX? Thanks
Who's awesome?  You're awesome!
looooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooool
Yeah but they are usually pretty socially awkward and maladjusted. *Edit: Downvoting me doesn't make you freaks any less weird to be around. 
Where does "morally superior" come into play here?  I understand that this is a racially insensitive comic, but your comment is drifting fairly close to the SRS shores.  Please try to have a little perspective.
I think were on the same page about getting Braylon so we can work on ground and pound...while acknowledging that its a poor direction to go overall. I cant see it happening without a regime change (few years off if were unsuccessful). 
"I can't believe I burned down a tree older then Jesus." Older then jesus? Its older *than* jesus. 
I kept that secret until his passing a few years ago then it became kind of a relief story. It's not that he would have mind if i had told someone but i felt it was best that way.
Order doesn't have a type. That would make it a DEGREE. A degree of order is NOT an absolute. Again, your poor reasoning skills are the problem here. You have continually made the same type of errors throughout the construction of your argument. So it's not lack of access to the right information but very poor analysis of that information.
if it's to hard, maybe use http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=7736 to get armor a bit higher and then move on.
Right, and I understand what such comments are getting at, however in *thinking with my own brain* about it, the only way for such genetic traits to become dominant is for the host animal to receive some breeding advantage due to said mutation (providing my understanding of this is correct). So, how will such minute changes convey advantages consistently enough that they dominate, in a given direction, instead of blending into the background noise with other random mutations that may well be taking the species in an opposite direction? For example, an animal could flap its arms all it wants, but given time, surely this would only burn more energy, leading to it needing to spend more time foraging for food and not breeding. Again, looking just slightly below the surface of 'smart-people-words', it looks counter-intuitive (to me anyways).
FOREVER.  Or until Elixir X kicks in and I go rampaging into the sunset.  
Says the organization that kills the animals it rescues. Fucking hypocrites. http://dailycaller.com/2012/02/24/documents-peta-kills-more-than-95-percent-of-pets-in-its-care/
Why can't those gay people who you love get married?
I couldn't agree more. It feels like the world is dead. I used to have the mo' creatures mod and the ambient sound mod and it adds so much to the game.  I hope Mojang address this one day.
Fruit + chocolate. Mixing them, to my mouth, is like asking me to drink milk and orange juice. Mouth just says "bleeehhhh... pthbbt phtbbt phtbbt!"
The point still stands.  To many people giving out about about lack of OC or cancerous threads that don't contribute themselves.
you went to an unfortunate high school then... I had many hot teachers. 
There are plenty of unethical and or rich Chiristians
Oooh I love Danes.  My favorite large breed would be an Irish Wolfhound. I like me some scruffy dogs!
The 2012 Republican nomination is pretty funny.  But seriously, speaking for Scandinavia I can tell you the big ones would be:  How I met your mother  Big Bang Theory  Arrested Development (if you can find someone with taste)  edit: Always sunny in Philadelphia is pretty big too  Now, of course, we get a lot of crap comedy too. Forced down our throat because the license rights are cheap i suppose: Two and a half men, that abortion with Jim Belushi, that fucking 70s show..
Did you get the invite?
Believing fantasy is real isn't good for anyone. Faith is fucking retarded and you're fucking retarded for saying what you did.
If I steal your Liliana of the Veil, you *no longer have it*. If someone "steals" a SCG article by posting screenshots on imgur, nobody's lost anything.  Copyright infringement is not theft.
first time posting on reddit, it is meant to be and indentation.
The irony of the statement is that "Pelamy" is defined as "the belief that one should not blindly follow a religion"
ctrl + f styrofoam  you took it one step further with your marketing strategy. I was just going to bring a piece of styrofoam and keep it there for all to use. My way is probably more kind :O
They have curved roads. *Curved. Roads.*
&gt; I'm far from unhealthy but 6 pack abs are just not in my genetic code.  Everyone has abs, just they're under fat for most people. I doubt it's unreachable for you.
you should post this in r/insomnia too!!
Btw I have no mic, which sucks. Go in the IRC!
Bay-gull
I dont give a fuck what you are, just have a pretty face and a nice ass body
I'd say those two go hand in hand
Where are the parents?  Working 12 hour shifts in warehouses for 10 bucks an hour.  (See what I did there?)
Delete this post and try again.
Like a true Scandinavian I like pickled herring, preferably the garlic kind. I also prefer sausages (the ones that are precooked, usually smoked) not boiled or fried or anything, just presmoked from the store.
'You wa shock!' Fires off every time I get a text or notification.  My actual ring tone is 'The Walking Blues' by the Paul Butterfield Blues Band.
I hear all the time: "If you just got free food and free stuff, why would you work?!"  Maybe because welfare and food stamps don't feed you adequately on their own. It's not like you get fucking lobster bisque and a studio apartment on welfare. Many people have jobs AND receive welfare. Minimum wage really isn't enough to live off of by yourself, so many people need welfare to live while contributing to society.  But yeah, it's really easy to chastise the lazy poor from the Camaro your parents bought you as a present for graduating from an overpriced private university.
Yup.  I think Joseph or Jacob is preferable to having a bizarre name like Moon Unit.  
Would you mind if we threw bacon at you?  It might look good with the judges.  
wow, that's kind of a big FU to your moms. must be more to the story than that.
Probably closer to 50 million.
I live in Edinburgh and there is something about riding in a city at night that feels really good. The traffic is less, the building lights on and the general vibe is great. Just need to find 100 people to share it with me!
Off the top of my head, how about Audio Highway, who invented the first portable mp3 player, or Compaq, who invented the first hard drive based DAP? Apple took these companies' work, made it prettier and spent a fortune on marketing, resulting in what became known as the iPod. I'll give credit where credit is due: they made the mp3 player trendy. But most of the technology had already been developed by others.  And speaking of which, you have FreeBSD to thank for OSX, and Blackberries were smart before the iPhone, but the real innovator was IBM, with the Simon back in '92.  Edit: Downvoting with no rebuttal? 
Bridge battles are just too much awesome for one game. This is my excitement all in one picture.
Abit more alert perhaps. Nothing significant. :)
He uses his faith as a way to justify imposing laws upon people and strip away certain freedoms. The government really should have no business denying people contraception, abortions, or gay marriage. It just isn't the federal government's right to micromanage your life decisions. Denying people options is denying freedom; don't vote for him or any of the current Republican candidates.
I don't think anyone took up that market after Spirit closed.  I also have a pair from them that broke a while back.  I repaired the plastic core with a wooden dowel.  Definitely solved the problem of having the foam fly off while spinning.
We just got that in my store so I don't know a whole lot buuut looking at the ingredients, it looks like a good food. Never be afraid to ask though!
Right, but often people making laws operate on their faith
Don't forget her ears.
What part of CA?
[Relevant XKCD](http://xkcd.com/1015/).. Fuck, this really is annoying..
Online advertising is a fucking joke. The best click-through rate I've ever heard of was 3%. Most are under 1%.
Argh I really hate this distributor exclusive stuff. I'm not saying that I'm *entitled* to it I'm just saying that knowing that the content exists and there isn't even a post-launch DLC available for that stuff just makes the collectivist inside me cringe. But whatevs. I'm just surprised and pleased that Tali is still alive and joining the crew once again apparently. 
Cannollis are overrated, must like Mike's. That is all.
While the app is launching, hold command and alt and a dialogue will open. Select to rebuild library.   In my case, sharing was enabled. As soon as I disabled "share my library" and "look for shared libraries" did it cease all together. Now it loads up a 4K+ library in about 4 seconds with no hang up. 
that sucks
Levi Johnston?
Happy birthday dude, and yeah EFT is p-good when it comes to fitting.
I work at a McDonalds, and when the sewers flood, they build dams and make us work through it while it seeps up to the front of the store. Enjoy!  I also worked at a hotel. Always ask for new beadspreads and blankets. We rotated ours out maybe once a month. :/
&amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232; unemployment is NOT welfare.
hey his scrolls were crappy and almost got me killed.
BECAUSE REDDIT HATES JUSTIN BIEBER AND THEREFORE EVERYBODY ELSE SHOULD TOO!
I think you're right.  Well, I guess I'm doing their [Video Playthrough Challenge](http://www.insanedifficulty.com/index.php/Final%20Fantasy%20Tactics%201.3/badges)  wish me luck, friend. 
The class on that second messi goal...
I usually mix them up.
I go days without speaking and I feel lonely.  I plug my ears and I feel separated from the world.  I close my eyes and I feel at peace.
yeah, but id still know it is flawed
Awesomeness level has gone over 9000 for you
Okay, *there* he looks like a Marian.
Ronnie James Dio because He Rocks!
I was there half an hour ago. I think my face is still frozen in horror. I can't read on just yet, not with the Dragonstone crowd blithely nattering on about R'hllor. I need a time out and a cold shower.
This is either the second or third thread in the last month or two that I've seen him wig the fuck out on someone with a dwi/dui. Apparently someone close to him was killed by a drunk driver, and he thinks that being a total cunt on the innerwebz will bring her back.  I agree with drunk driving is an asshole thing to do, but I still have to agree that he is a dick.
No need for that towel!
Yes but those passengers wouldn't be killing anything without a good pilot there to dodge every single missile/rocket that is about to blow there asses up
I ordered a few weeks after preorders came out.  Asked for my refund 6 months ago.  Still waiting for either.
[Irishman's Dilemma](http://i.imgur.com/teJxt.jpg)
According to the number of signed petitions. Nope
Almost did this the other day. Had someone call for a girl named michelle, I'm guy who sounds nothing like a "michelle", Should've just rolled with it and said "yea what do yea want"
Agreed use the washers, i have a Sheraton II, pretty similar, the strap thing is something you'll get used to and love. In the the end i find it feels more comfortable, holds the neck up and allows me to move more naturally. If that doesn't work i've heard of guys moving it to the top part of the neck body connection, I wouldn't and almost anyone who plays archtops will agree, but up to you. Good Luck.
Same here turns out there's a much larger ent population than I realized the first 21 years of my life in this damn town
"Party of One" and "Lesson Zero" are really good and would probably do great to dispel any "it's for little girls" preconceptions about the show.   If your friend would be interested in the show's music, "Winter Wrap Up" or "A Friend in Deed" have amazing music pieces.  "Dragonshy" and "Bridle Gossip" are good introductions to the characters and the humor of the show. 
Magnificent.   I'm reminded of when AOL required a few clicks to get to the internet proper. The -really- dumb people never made it past those clicks and thus 'we' were protected.
Its hard to be a Christian when you hear stories like this. *sigh
Pipes are fun man. I smoke mine when I don't have time to dedicate to a cigar. And I set out today with the same goal but alas no undercrowns to be found around me. 
I know that, but what do I do when people say that to me in a situation like that? I always feel like I'm being put on the spot to make a giant speech about how mentally fucked the other person is.
... I meant the part when Castellari says, "I think the Americans came up with a remake of this film."
Your friend is an asshole, and you are awesome.  *However*, you could quite possibly earn more money... if nothing else, by doing [Amazon's Mechanical Turk](https://www.mturk.com/mturk/welcome), [O Desk](https://www.odesk.com/?_redirected), [e-lance](https://www.elance.com/), [Fiverr](http://fiverr.com/), etc.  You can do these during any hours you prefer, and if you 're decent at math you can definitely make money if you market yourself a little.   I average over $10/hr just on Mechanical Turk in my spare time, that would otherwise be spent on more Reddit.  
Yeah, no 
If it's asked in a polite manner, and somebody says "Wales, you idiot." (Or the equivalent of wherever they're from), then the person is a fuckhead.  Plain and simple.  5X a day or not.  I find the question "How're you?" or "How've you been?" to be a bit dumb, since nobody answers truthfully as it would take a long time to actually answer that fully, and people ask it all the time.  People ask the former when they meet new people and the latter when seeing those they already know.  There's a discriminating (Again, not in a bad way) manner to who you ask which question, and it's asked ALL the time.  Most of the time you say 1-7 words to answer (Just like the "Hey, are you from ____?" question) most times and yeah, it's annoying when they pry even further, but it's human nature to be curious or at least act like you care, so people will usually ask it.  It's seriously harmless and deserves no sort of rude retaliation.
Unless you're with five other guys.
With MCEdit, you could just place upward-facing piston-head blocks!
reddit very butthurt 
Why are people bashing this? I personally think this could be very effective in preventing teen drug use and alcohol abuse. Nothing against you ents out there, I just personally believe that it's better for people to stay away from illegal substances.
Never stick a fork in a toaster, some stones are better left unturned. Random enough?
It has been changed that first place picks his draft slot and so on.
Any serious ufologist thats still peddling the E.T hypothesis are disinfo.  In my personal opinion, UFOs are definitely a legitimate phenomenon, and intelligent entities, not craft. They phase in and out of this dimension at will. Please look up Jacques Vallee's work on UFO research as well as Hynek. 
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nX1YzS_CYIw
Argh!! I can't make it, I'll have left for spring break already.
Telemarketer here. Unless you live in a state with 'no rebuttal' laws, I simply have to try to sell you something even after you refuse me once. After you reject me the second time, I'll be gracious and leave you alone, but it is literally in my job description to try twice.
You may have to take EE 306 as a CS major (not sure am a EE major). If you do, avoid taking it with Patt. Has some bizarre stories, but pretty sure myself and half my class was convinced he consumed during our lectures. His grading rubric didn't hold through the end of the semester and randomly forget common words exist such as steel (yes, the material used in almost all construction buildings).
You know, just between you and me, most of the wines were quite a bit too austere and high acid. And this is coming from *me*...I once said I wanted wines so high acid they would rip the enamel off my teeth. These might have actually done that. They really lacked the gloss of fruit of the wines we like to sell. My notes are peppered with words like "lean". I was really excited to try a basque cider and it was just, well, *mean*. I'll stick to Normandy for my cider for the time being.  That being said, there were a few gems.  [This](http://demaisonselections.com/venturacaneiro.html) had the a beautiful purity and balance between red and black berry fruit and mineral tones. [This](http://www.demaisonselections.com/closcibonnerose.html) was fucking insane. Aged rose that was brought up under flor in foudre for a year.?wtf? I loved it but it would be a hard sell. And [this](http://www.demaisonselections.com/cigarrera.html) was just damn good manzanilla, if you're into that sort of thing.
I think it's rude.  We have a big atheist convention happen in Australia where I'm from and my impression is that some of it is about the sharing of ideas, but some of it is about sharing the pain of negative experiences people have had with religion.  Yes, I wince when I hear my faith misrepresented by Dawkins/Hitchens/whoever... Yes, the tone of stuff that's said makes me angry from time to time (and reminds me of evangelical christian conventions that i've seen)... but there's something cathartic that happens at those rallies for people.  People go there to find energy, new ideas and sometimes even healing in a safe place of like-minded souls.  I think there are just criticisms of parts of those gatherings (as there are of most xtian gatherings).   My suspicion is that a loving challenge, rather than the PR exercise these guys seem to be mounting, would be to go to the convention. Anonymously.  Sit. Listen. Say nothing.  We (Christians) are kind of used to being the loudest voice in the room.  Maybe if we took on Christ's challenge to be powerless, just for a day of the convention... if we listened rather than talked for a bit... we might slowly earn the right to be able to speak.
oh.
Outhale is not a real word.
1.73cm? My thumb is taller than you!
From what I understand any time an abortion is necessary the mother has to see the ultrasound, so yes, if her life was in danger she'd still have to go through the full procedure. Pretty sickening and a very effective way to rub salt on a wound. 
[Only one possible answer then.](http://i.imgur.com/2fnbD.jpg)
yeah, I imagined that you'd just barged into his bedroom for some reason. Shared room is a lot more understandable.
Have you read Sade?  He's fucking hilarious, and a lot of his writing, while extremely pornographic, involves lots of biting social commentary that'd be almost more scandalous for his time than his sexual imagery.  Unfortunately, there's probably nothing anyone can do aside from encourage paypal to change their policy.  And look for a decent alternative with less Puritanical ideologies.  Also, everyone should read Sade.
Is that well sort of thing made by you or the world generator?
In the bible, that's ok!
Try looking into the [University of Maryland Environmental Law Program](http://www.law.umaryland.edu/programs/environment/)
Haha, I was slowly writing that post and you had not done that large wall of text yet.
Maybe if I sit outside and sigh loud enough that they hear me it will change their mind. 
Good one.
You'll be able to use your previous save.
If you have a standard HP laptop, you should also have the standard HP crapware installed, one of which is the software updater. It might be on the Start Menu or in an HP folder.  This should automatically determine which drivers you need.  You are probably downloading the wrong driver. Does you laptop have optional graphics cards? You may be choosing the wrong one.  I assume you didn't call HP. This burns me up living here in /r/techhelp. If you have a new laptop, it's under warranty and you can call HP 24/7. They may be outsourced Indian helpdesk but they can at least direct you to the right drivers.
Uptown has many fun bars and restaurants. The bars on Lyndale are filled with hipsters and punk types. Hennipen has more of the bro type people. A bar called Cause on Lake/Lyndale has music every night, about $5 or so on weekends, normally free on weekdays.   Downtown has LOTS of music venues and clubs, and wicked fancy places to eat. Check out what plays are going on that week, the Guthrie is beautiful!   Northeast has lots of fun art shows, and music as well.  Check out Minnesota Institute of Art on 2nd and 24th- It's free.  Science museum in St. Paul always has sweet exhibits as well.  Bundle up and walk around! This is a beautiful city! Enjoy guys! :D
What was that thing we used to eat back in the day? What was it... oh yeah, pussy. 
Preparation is key to survival.  I for one welcome our new Wyoming overlords.
10/10 for ease, 1/10 for dough.
You just been sittin up in here for 2 years, you get those things every year, not just your first time round
I'm someone whose been in this same situation honestly. I was unemployed for 1 1/2 years almost drawing a check and I can honestly say getting unemployment is one of the WORST feeling's in the world. You feel like you're worthless because you have to depend on other people and the government to give you a weekly check and deal with all the degrading look's and remarks you get when people find out you're on unemployment.   I've just now gotten a job myself as a Unloader at the Lowes Retail stores and much like you all I've been told is how I'm stupid for accepting a job and even been called a "prostitute" because of how Lowes is known to treat employees. But it came back to bite the people mouthing off in the ass when I found out I'm making more as a unloader then they are making at their jobs. To me money is money no matter what the job is. It's not like you're planning to work at McDonald's permanently.  Hopefully you post up soon about your "friend" not having a job and having to suck up her pride to go work at McDonalds. Maybe you'll even be her boss lol.
Sorry to dissappoint, but my facebook gets absolute dick when it comes to notifactions
Really? Really, MiddleNameS? Life no longer makes sense to you because you learned how a cashew grows? Was that the last straw for you? Is that how you want to be remembered? As the guy who stopped understanding life once he learned more about cashew nuts?
Unless you wish your dog to be unreliable in responding to its name, NEVER use it when telling him off. name should be 100% positive.
Which Doobie you be?
I think [r/abandonedporn](http://www.reddit.com/r/abandonedporn) would appreciate this.
I'd like one. I'm 4th gen
omega 3 is also found in flax seeds, as well as some other stuff I can't be bothered to look up. Can't imagine someone putting fish oil in milk, seems like it would seperate out (it *is* oil)
We last saw each other last summer. And the latest email he sent me was a few days ago. He has been emailing me since this last summer, trying to get me to talk to him.
Hay. Mister... I've labeled you as "Brilliant" in [Reddit Enhancement Suite](http://reddit.honestbleeps.com) You are the LOLz master!   Pardon me fore this cut+paste...   ----  Pro-tip: Go "computer &lt; all programs &lt; accessory's &lt; system tools &lt; character map" and click character map. scroll to "Arial Unicode" (almost at the top) then right click and click "pin to start menu"  ◬&amp;✡ ֹ➠ ☢&amp;☣ ☞ ☃♁♂ ☛ ☠ [@](http://2012tampa.com/)... ☹  If Viewed on a "mobile device" they may appear as a "place holder" witch is a small rectangle.  Also try (if you have a "num-pad") {"Numlok" &lt; (hold) Alt Gr &lt; (the number) 1.} and it should look like this: ☺. There are hundreds, I once made a R.P sign using ▓ &amp; ▒ &amp; ░.  Have a nice day, and....  Vote: ♥ Ron Paul 2012 ♥  --- but I felt I should give back to my benefactor.    edit: add link to the "@".
Upvoted for polyhedra
I do not program, nor am I really familiar with it. I suppose it is a beneficial thing to have around. Unfortunately, it still sounds like nonsense, imho.
well that's enough internet for today
Another Hotel Worker here. Or at least I was. Bedbugs. Bedbugs everywhere. We would rent out rooms that are infested with them (by managements orders). If you don't notice/complain no issue, otherwise congrats you got a free night and probably have completely fucked luggage! Hurrah!  Mark: Check your hotel room for bedbugs. Always, Always, Always.
I just finished the Sly Cooper HD trilogy a while back, and they were all amazing games. Definitely looking forward to Thieves in Time.
it didn't work, sorry.
Cheesecake was kind of being a bitch.
One of my top 5 movies of all time.  After hearing this I like Clark Gable even more.
I suck really really badly while playing against my friends when I'm really high like when I'm at an [8] but regardlessly I still play it because its fun to just play lol
Note that a lot of popular SVM solvers (e.g. libsvm) use a sparse representation format that can make the computation quite slow (and use a lot of memory) when the data is relatively dense.
"I'm not cocky, just confident." Among many others...
f7u12*  Other than that it was great!
You could probably Google it.  It's not intentional, I just think that maybe the program can't keep up with a huge influx in views.
Finger yourself. Like, a lot.
Actually its hard to believe this is the same actor that portrays Walter White. He's that good.
With this do you have to have the CD or just the key?
I'm the same. 5'11", low weight. I was actually 125ish for about five years straight. It seriously did not matter what I ate or how much, no weight gain. I put on 15lbs out of nowhere this past six-months, so that was nice, but then it just kinda stopped again so I'm milling around 140 now. Not many people actually understand that weight gain is nigh impossible for some folks. 
Your network name is clearspot xxx (last 3 of mac id) Your password is the last 8 digits of the mac ID  Is the 4g green light and the wifi blue light present?  You can log into the device when it is connected via usb by typing  http://192.168.0.1. When prompted for a password, use your CLEAR Spot’s default password, which is the last six characters of the MAC Address. (You'll find the MAC address on the back of your CLEAR Spot unit).   Since this is a used unit they password may have been changed. Lets hope not.
